Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Number of Reviews
47

Author
Jeff Pidgeon
        "Men in Black", this summer's wildly anticipated, big-budget offering
from Amblin Entertainment and Barry ("The Addams Family") Sonnenfeld, is a very
entertaining (if somewhat familiar) genre picture that aims to please and does
so consistently.  Will Smith plays James Edwards, a New York cop who stumbles 
across "level 6 agents of the INS" while attempting to apprehend what he thinks
is an ordinary felon.  It turns out (as it has in "Stargate", "ID4" and many
episodes of "The X-Files", I imagine) that the Roswell cover-ups were indeed
real and all of those UFO stories that we've heard over the years are true.
In fact, aliens are still visiting Earth, and the main job of those who
become the Men in Black is to monitor the aliens who are kept hidden on Earth
and make sure that their existence remains undetected by the general 
public.  "It's just like 'Casablanca'", says Smith's mentor K (played by Tommy
Lee Jones), "except without the Nazis".
        Much of the feel of this film is similar to "Ghostbusters" in its pre-
mise of a fantastic extraterrestrial subculture within the framework of a cas-
ual, everyday job.  The film is at its best when milking that contrast for 
laughs, often depicting the aliens as having little patience with humanity's 
persistently backward ways.  The audience is introduced to the world and its
characters, as well as the antagonist who wishes to bring about the end of the
world (again, similar to "Ghostbusters").  Herein lies the main weakness of the
script, as much of the climactic showdown between the villain (whose main mo-
tivation seems to be to cause destruction in that movie-villain way) and our
heroes is not so much a climax as another event in the film -- a plateau rather
than an inspired capper.  The film is so much fun, peppered with plenty of 
funny, smart dialogue, that it's a shame that the final sequence isn't one of 
the stronger gags in the film (as the marshmallow man was in "Ghostbusters").
Still, Lowell Cunningham & Ed Solomon's script is well structured aside from 
these problems, with clear set-ups which pay off pleasantly later.  Predicta-
bility is also a problem, but not to a point where it sinks the film.  It simp-
ly makes it less surprising than it could have been.
        It's clear that everyone involved here was enthusiastic about the pro-
ject, and to its benefit all of the elements were mixed in good proportion to
one another.  Computer animation, make-up, practical and miniature effects are
all used in concert here (each to its respective strength), and the results are
exceptional.  Kudos to the various effects teams for some terrific work!  
Danny Elfman has whipped up an especially versatile score for this picture, 
brash and agressive at times, subdued and tense at others.  Jones and Smith 
(even the anonymity of their names seems intentional) work very well together
here; rather than attempt to out-act each other, Jones plays the straight man
(along with Rip Torn, who echoes a similar role in "Defending Your Life") to
the film's loopiness.  Both make the most of their roles and successfully cre-
ate nicely contrasting characters.  When the villain snatches a cab for his
getaway, Smith bolts for the street, frantically searching amidst a sea of 
taxis, while Jones calmly descends the stairs toward their own car.  Linda Fi-
orentino plays Dr. Weaver (a morgue doctor who gets caught up in the proceed-
ings) with her usual panache that has served her well elsewhere and makes her
stand out in an otherwise limited role.  It's a shame that she has little else
to do but lay the foundation of the upcoming sequel franchise (what will they
call the sequel?  "People in Black"?).  Vincent D'Onofrio is also quite unnerv-
ing yet hilarious as the disguised alien antagonist, who nicely communicates
the qualities of one who is clearly not used to a human form.  Bo Welch contin-
ues the visual snap he has brought to many of Tim Burton's films with produc-
tion design that is beautiful, but with a sense of fun that compliments the
picture.  A design highlight is MIB headquarters, a silver-and-white spoof of
sixties spy pop.
        This is clearly Sonnenfeld's best picture to date, one where the excep-
tional efforts of a strong team help to offset the formulaic structure of a 
genre picture.  How can you not like a film where an alien race apologizes for
starting the process of Earth's destruction?  With a terrific final shot.
Recommended.

Author
skad13@my-deja.com
Men in Black almost makes one wish for an old Abbott and Costello Meet
Whoever flick. Whatever one's opinion about A&C, at least they had some
chemistry. In Men in Black, Will Smith knocks off one improv routine
after another, and Tommy Lee Jones stands frozen, waiting to deliver his
next line. The two of them hardly even seem to be in the same scene.
The best movie comedy has always been simple, but Men in Black takes the
Blues Brothers approach, thinking that $80 million and a couple of guys
in cool sunglasses ought to garner sufficient laughs. Smith and Jones
spend an awful lot of time reacting to blank screens waiting to be
filled in by the visual effects guys, and an even awfuller lot of time
is filled with exploding spaceships that look like outtakes from Plan 9
from Outer Space.
The plot is based on a popular comic book (What isn't these days?) about
the ultimate alien immigration service--in this case, the aliens are
from "out there," not the U.S. border. Agent K (Tommy Lee Jones) needs a
partner, and after a sadly unfunny induction scene, he chooses New York
cop James Edwards (Will Smith, his role cribbed from Beverly Hills Cop),
who is dubbed Agent J.
Supposedly, New York is routinely filled with aliens, which is fine with
K as long as things don't get out of hand. But a bug in human disguise
(Vincent D'Onofrio) starts killing off alien royalty and tries to hijack
Earth, and of course it's up to J and K to stop him.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld ought to be the right choice for this
material, having put offbeat characters through their paces in the
Addams Family movies and Get Shorty. But the movie is so far removed
from the human element as to be off-putting. Sonnenfeld has always been
a sucker for wild point-of-view shots (he began as a cinematographer on
Raising Arizona), but here he really uses up his quota. Someone should
take his camera and nail it to the floor for a while.
And the movie is unusually mean-spirited and repulsive. One of the
alien's victims is a backwater wife whose husband's body was stolen to
provide human cover for the alien bug. So this gives Will Smith license
to do a riff on the woman's trashy lifestyle. And D'Onofrio, as the bug
in question, develops so many tics that he becomes painful to watch.
(Sonnenfeld seems to find deteriorating human flesh a huge laugh-getter.
Sorry, it didn't work in An American Werewolf in London, either.)
Jones and Rip Torn, normally a couple of great actors, are reduced to
standing around looking at giant monitors as though they were extras on
"Star Trek." Tony Shalhoub (of TV's "Wings") is so effects-laden, he
hardly gets a chance to show whether or not he can act. And Linda
Fiorentino has that thankless sci-fi role, the brilliant female doctor
who's there mainly to display her shapely legs.
As for Will Smith, I admit that people around me were guffawing at his
one-liners, but for me, his act is strictly second-rate Eddie Murphy.
And a couple of his more racially oriented remarks would probably cause
riots in the theaters if they were uttered by a Caucasian.
The movie's most-used joke is Agent K's "neuralyzer"--a weapon that
shoots a beam of light which causes people to forget that they just saw
an alien life form. There ought to be men with neuralyzers stationed in
the theater lobby after every showing of Men in Black.
Men in Black is rated PG-13 for frequent profanity and graphic scenes of
murder and explosions.
Submitted by: Steven Bailey
http://pages.hotbot.com/movies/skad13
Steven Bailey, a movie reviewer for The Beaches Leader newspaper in
Jacksonville Beach, Florida, has movie reviews posted in The Internet
Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Steven+Bailey

Author
Chad Polenz
1997, PG-13, 98 minutes [1 hour, 38 minutes]
starring: Tommy Lee Jones (Agent K), Will Smith (James Edwards/Agent J),
Linda Fiorentino (Dr. Laurel Weaver), Vincent D'Onofrio (Edgar - The Bug);
written by Ed Solomon; produced by Laurie MacDonald, Walter F. Parkes;
directed by Barry Sonnenfeld; based on the comic book and characters created
by Lowell Cunningham.
Seen Sunday, November 2, 1997 at 2:20 p.m. at the Crossgates Mall Cinema 12
(Guilderland, N.Y.), theater #6 [?], with my brother John for $4.75. [Theater
rating: ***: good seats, picture, and sound] 
Movies geared towards massive audiences tend not to be too complicated or
have much intelligence to them. Americans especially like to watch things
they don't have to think too much about. What's good about "Men In Black" is
that, technically, it's another lightweight, mass-market comedy/adventure,
but it's also a clever satire. It appeals to both the child and the adult in
us.
It's difficult to make a film intended for the family that can actually be
enjoyed by all members.  But this movie starts off well by displaying its
ability to do just that. The first scene depicts a truck full of illegal
aliens which is stopped by highway patrolmen, until two men in black suits
show up and take over. Agent K (Jones) singles out one of the immigrants and
brings him back into the desert where his true identity is revealed. He's an
illegal alien all right - one from another planet who doesn't have a
passport. 
The dialogue between K and the alien is cartoony, but witty, in a
"Simpson's" sort of way. Even though there's a slimy sight gag, it was built
up through satire, which shows how the comedy succeeds on many levels.
Satire derives its power from great acting. Anyone can write a joke, but it
takes talent to make subtle comedy funny. Tommy Lee Jones is fantastic here
as the Joe Friday-like Agent K. His sense of timing is perfect and his
deadpan delivery makes everything he says or does seem both serious and
funny. 
Then there's his counterpart, the always hyperactive Will Smith as James
Edwards, an NYPD officer who is asked to join "Men in Black" (the secret
agency K works for), because of an encounter he had with an alien.  Many
consider Smith a typecast actor who always plays characters like himself -
but it doesn't matter because he's hilarious! It seems like he improvises
every joke and gag, yet he never repeats himself.
The actual plot of the film involves some kind of pending inter-galactic war
with Earth in the middle. Agents J and K's job is to find a "bug" (D'Onofrio
as "Edgar") whose ship crash-landed on a farm in upstate New York. He has
made his way to NYC and wreaks havoc like a zombie in an Ed Wood movie, and
if they don't find him soon something terrible is going to happen. 
There's a lot of detail and attention given to the MIB operation, which not
only makes the comedy even funnier and the satire more clever, but shows how
the film doesn't cop-out where most others would. Everything the characters
do has a purpose, and there's a good sense of mystery here. At times I wasn't
quite sure what was going on, but because the story is so lighthearted I was
never hopelessly lost.
Not much more needs to be said about the film because the comedy is so
broad. It would be difficult to list even a few examples without describing,
in detail, the context in which they take place. Everything's just plain fun,
and the ending is a real hoot.
Special mention must be given to Linda Fiorentino as Dr. Laurel Weaver, the
sexy coroner who never plays the role of the damsel in distress nor the
butt-kicking, "strong-willed woman" stereotype. 
"Men In Black" is the epitome what the summer blockbuster movie should be:
just plain fun.
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz - over 180
new and old films reviewed in depth, not just blind ratings and quick
capsules. Also, check out The FIRST Shay Astar Web Page @
http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz/ShayAstar.html
To receive Chad'z movie reviews directly, send e-mail to ChadPolenz@aol.com
with "subscribe" in the header.

Author
Walter Frith
     If you're looking for a movie that lampoons references to many other
films and in particular, one t.v. show and if you're looking for an original
and at times pleasantly shocking delight then 'Men in Black' is the movie for
you.  Executive produced by Steven Spielberg and directed by Barry Sonnenfeld
('Get Shorty', 'The Addams Family'), 'Men in Black' stars Tommy Lee Jones as
a secret undercover agent working to protect the Earth from 'the scum of the
universe.'  His elderly partner is about to retire and Jones' boss (Rip Torn)
seeks a replacement and finds it in a sharp and clever NYC cop played in a
gleefully daffy manner by Will Smith.
     Based on the Malibu comic of the same name, 'Men in Black' works so well
in particular because of Jones' deadpan and loosely charismatic performance
as the agent who will do whatever it takes to get the job done.  Aside from
Smith in contrast to Jones' portrayal of the straight man is a campy and
tongue-in-cheek story of an alien landing in upstate New York whose passenger
is a giant insect, sort of a cross between a cockroach and an ant played by
Vincent D'Onofrio who assumes the identity of a dead farmer and 'borrows' his
skin and his presence could spell the end of the world for the Earth.
 D'Onofrio is hilarious as his haunting and wildly over the top performance
is reminiscent of one of the zombies from 'Night of the Living Dead' (1968),
(forget about the 1990 remake), and Linda Fiorentino rounds out the cast as a
doctor with the coroner's office who becomes entangled in a strange autopsy
she performs and discovers alien life on Earth.  
     The clever but not always instantly recognizable references to 'Pulp
Fiction', 'The X-Files', 'Ghostbusters', 'The Blob' and 'Close Encounters'
are funny enough to give 'Men in Black' extra marks for not making them so
obvious and while it establishes an identity of its own, its ability to not
takes itself seriously is what ultimately saves it.

Author
Terri Buchman
Some actors just belong on the silver screen, big as life and twice as
beautiful.  You can't really say why they belong there, but they sure as
shooting do.  It isn't just talent which is, after all, a fairly common
commodity.  It isn't technical skill or mastery of craft, although,
knowledge and pursuit of those things can keep a career going.  It is a
certain indefinable other, a combination of some acting ability, gobs of
charisma and the plain good luck of having the camera adore you.  This
ineffable quality is what makes an audience remember your name and forgive
the fact that the films that you appear in are a little shallow and corny.
It surely is what makes Will Smith a movie superstar.
Hey, life is unfair.  There are certainly actors (in the generic non-sex
specific sense) who have much more technical skill than Will Smith. There
are those who have spent years at Julliard and Yale Drama School, and other
august institutions of artistic learning, feverishly pondering the secrets
of drama and film acting.  I've seen and admired such actors and noted how
hard they have worked to achieve their cinematic wonders.  Hey, and then
there are folks like Mr. Smith, who appear to just walk under a kleig light
and just bedazzle an audience.  Just by showing up.  This guy has got *it*
and it's that indefinable quality that is making him a superstar.  (I can't
define what that *it* is, but i know it when I see it, and damned if I
wouldn't show up to watch this guy read from the phone book or recite his
laundry list.  I think he'd make it interesting.  I really do.)
Mr. Smith's latest movie, the hilarious MEN IN BLACK, is a case in point.
MIB features a dazzling array of special effects, a fanciful and witty
script by Ed Solomon and some wonderful direction from Barry Sonnenfeld.
But it's Will Smith who makes this picture rock and roll.  His onscreen
partnership with Tommy Lee Jones (who is at his FUGITIVE best here) is
wonderful.  Mr. Jones is a hilariously droll and deadpan counterpoint to
Mr. Smith's young, hip and definitely cool junior partner.  The
relationship works and is a lesson in how to make a special effects movie
in which the f/x don't overwhelm the story.  (Would that the recent BATMAN
picture had this quality.  Unfortunately, it was nearly the opposite of MIB
in nearly every respect from the way the f/x overshadowed everything else
on screen to the way that character development was given an early and
miscalculated death.  Hey Warner Bros, take a lesson.  It is possible to do
a comic book movie without reducing it to mindless drivel.)
MEN IN BLACK is a tongue-in-cheek story that takes all the paranoid
conspiracy theories about aliens-on-earth at face value.  It supposes a
super-secret neo-governmental agency that is in charge of controlling all
extra-terrestrial activity on earth.  Tongue planted firmly in cheek, the
movie 'explains' a lot of strange things that are going on on Planet Earth
as the result of alien visitors who just might be living among us.  Tommy
Lee Jones functions as the world-weary, seen-it-all senior agent, whose
deadpan line delivery is a funny marvel.  Mr. Smith and Mr. Jones are
perfectly cast and the interplay between the two (and the interplay with
Rip Torn from HBO's 'Larry Sanders Show') is an underplayed hoot.  (Yes,
I'm talking about enjoying the dialogue.  In a summer movie.  Boy does it
feel good to write that down.)
This is a lively picture that has a lot on it's plate.  Not only is it a
dead-on satire of "X-Files"style paranoia, but it features some beautiful
set design and bug-eyed alien creatures that are hilarious.  As with most
satires, the more you learn about this picture before you go in, the less
the satire works, so I'm not going to mention any specific scenes.  But I
wholeheartedly recommend this movie.  Go, sit back and let the whole silly
wonder of it rev up your summer.  And let Mr. Smith and Mr. Jones drive.
Trust me, you'll have a great time.
A word of caution:  allthough this is not by any means a horror movie,
there are some scenes and special effects that might scare some kids.  As
always, parents should not take highly sensitive or easily spooked kids.
The special effects are top notch and could give some (not all, just some)
kids nightmares.  For me, that means that my 12 year old daughter can see
it, but my ten year old son cannot.  (He is easily bothered by these
things.)  As ever, you know your kid best and your mileage may vary.

Author
Laurence Mixson
Men in Black (1997)Starring Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith, Linda
Fiorentino, VincentD'Onofrio, and Rip Torn.
Review by Laurence Mixson (jarls@datasync.com)
>From Fully Loaded Entertainment: http://www.geocities.com/~fullyloaded
        I hate to burst your bubble, but after all the star power, mega
bucks,screenwriters, directors, and cool trailers, Men in Black is not
the best  movie of the summer. It's pretty good in it's own right, yes,
but I would  probably split the "best movie" honors among Face/Off,
Spawn, Con Air,and maybe Event Horizon.
        It's main problem is that it's quickly forgettable, and I can't 
remember one truly good scene from it. From Con Air, it was the scene
out in the desert when they were digging the plane out from the dirt. In
Spawn, it was the "living room hell" conclusion at the end. In Event
Horizon, it was the video of the Event Horizon crew being taken over by
hell's forces. And all of Face/Off was pretty dang good. But as for Men
In Black, the only scene
I still recall is when Will Smith is squishing all those giant roaches.
I remember it not for it's humor but because I am hate roaches with a
passion and was pretty disgusted. And yes, I did see Mimic, which is
something I'll touch on in a later review.
        Back to Men in Black(is it just me, or does that sound funny?) I
remember first hearing about Men in Black back when I was a comic geek
in the 7th grade and read magazines like Wizard, etc.(for those of you
who aren't comic-geeks, Wizard is basically to comics what Car and
Driver is to cars, what The New Yorker is to high society, what Boy's
Life is to Boy Scots. Okay, that one was pretty pathetic.) Few people
know this, but Men in Black is based on a very obscure comic book
that was, while not honest-politician-rare, very hard to find. This was
after the release of the high-grossing Batman Forever, and it said that
Tommy Lee Jones and Chris O'Donnell were being considered for the
roles(in the comic book, there were no black Men in Black. Kind of
weird, huh?) All I can say is, thank God they didn't cast Chris
O'Donnell. I know I can't be the only person on the planet who thinks
he's an annoying, preppie little snot...
        Sorry. My apologies to O'Donnell fans. I actually had a 7th grade
teacher who was a big comic collector and was set to buy some of the
comics from him, anticipating rather craftily that, if the movie was a
big hit, it would drive up the price of the comics rather nicely. He
decided not to sell them to me, because they were "innappropriate".
Hmm....
        So now you're probably wondering why I've wasted about 5 paragraphs
with lame anecdotes from my junior high years. Good question. I'll move
on to the movie now. As you probably already know, Will Smith and Tommy
Lee Jones(Agents K and J, respectively) belong to a top secret agency
known as Divison 5, or it's nickname MIB(Men in Black.) Men in Black is
a reference to the black suits and sunglasses the agents wear, and
they're mission is to investigate reports of alien landings and keep the
aliens under control while they're here on earth. Not to get too
technical or spoil the plot for the 6 people in the world who haven't
seen this movie, but a basically-big-roach-type-bug lands in a redneck
farmer's yard, inhabits his body, and attempts to destroy the entire
universe. Not bad, eh?(I have no idea why I just typed that. I'm not
even really paying attention anymore.)
        The special effects are good yet dissapointing in Men in Black. I found
their main headquarters to be boring, as were the "cool weapons" they
had. The noisy cricket just plain sucked, no matter what anyone said.
        And the movie definitely surprised me in tone, although it probably
shoudln't have. It's director, Barry Sonnenfield, is known for "black
humor", directing both Addams Family movies. This movie was basically a
"black comedy", not an action/sci-fi like I expected from the trailers.
        Don't get me wrong on what I think of this movie. It's not bad, I gave
it ***. It was mostly entertaining throughout it's run, and had a
very good ending, although I think I was the only person in the theater
not amazed by it. My diagnosis for this picture: a good weekend rental,
but not worth a movie ticket. Of course, the movie is now long gone from
theaters, but that's beside the point. I think.

Author
David Landers
RATING: *** 1/2 out of **** - 8.5 out of 10.0
CAST: Tommy Lee Jones (Agent Kay), Will Smith (James Edwards/Agent Jay),
Linda Fiorentino (Dr. Laurel Weaver/Agent Elle), Vincent D'Onofrio
(Edgar), Rip Torn (Zed) 
DIRECTOR: Barry Sonnenfeld
CERTIFICATION: PG-13 (USA) mild violence and language
YEAR OF PRODUCTION: 1997
MEN IN BLACK is an explosive mix of science fiction, action, and comedy
that hits the target in every possible way.  Although another alien movie,
MEN IN BLACK succeeds in every way that INDEPENDENCE DAY didn't, and
towers above many other movies of its type.  The brilliant acting,
especially by Tommy Lee Jones as Agent Kay, is also as good as it gets.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld, who was behind the camera for THE ADDAMS FAMILY
movies and GET SHORTY, has crafted a masterpiece.
The story behind MEN IN BLACK is just as interesting as you would want it
to be.  The Men in Black, or MiB, are a top-secret governmental agency
that is not known to exist.  The MiB are responsible for "saving the world
from the scum of the universe".  A though job, indeed.  The film opens
with a truckload of illegal aliens (the human kind) being transported
across the Mexico border and into the United States.  Presumably, these
"aliens" are all migrant workers.  That is, until the MiB show up and
begin interrogating them.  Agent Kay selects a particular suspicious
worker and takes him away from the other local authorities to discover
that he is not an illegal human alien, but a real extra-terrestrial alien.
When the alien makes a run for it, Agent Kay is forced to eliminate the
alien with one of the MiB's very unique weapons, and after one of the
local law enforcement officers witnesses this bizarre occurrence, Agent
Kay is forced to use another very unique device on them.  The device,
described as "out of state", eliminates the memory of anyone it is used
on.
>From here, we are introduced to James Edwards, played very well by Will
Smith.  Edwards, a police officer, is chasing a fleeing criminal.  The
criminal gives a very good chase, and at one point when Edwards confronts
him, the criminal pulls out a very different looking weapon that
disintegrated when it hit the ground.  Edwards continues to chase the very
athletic criminal to the top of a building, where the criminal informs
Edwards that he must let him go, because someone is after him.  Edwards
doesn't take this seriously, but when the criminal shows very non-human
characteristics and leaps off the building, he begins to wonder.
Back at the police station, Agent Kay shows up to ask Edwards a few
questions.  He informs Edwards that is was, in fact, a non-human that he
was chasing, and that the gun he pulled out was definitely not man-made.
He has Edwards identify the gun, and asks Edwards to come to the MiB
headquarters the following day.
Edwards arrives and finds that he is involved in a recruiting process,
along with various other men who seem a bit more qualified than he.  After
goofing up for half of the time, Edwards puts on a show at the firing
range, and Agent Kay notes the reason why he feels Edwards should be the
man to join the MiB: he chased down the "criminal" on foot, which is
something that no one is supposed to be able to do.
In the meantime, an upstate New York farm has a very close encounter.
Edgar (Vincent D'Onofrio), owner of the farm, investigates a strange crash
landing and is attacked by the inhabitant of the flying object, which
presumes to jump inside Edgar and use his body as a human transport.  The
"bug", as he is called, is an intergalactic terrorist who has come to
Earth to attempt to kill two ambassadors.  And it up to the MiB, with
newly recruited Agent Jay (formerly James Edwards) to exterminate the bug
and save the planet from intergalactic war.
MEN IN BLACK delightfully combines fast-paced action with often hilarious
comedy, which is usually from Will Smith, although Tommy Lee Jones opens
up his comedic personality in this film.  The special effects are also
very well done and are not the entire source of the plot, as in another
big alien film from the past summer.  Screenwriter Ed Solomon, writer of
SUPER MARIO BROS. and the upcoming X-MEN film, has surely struck gold with
this story.  All ages will enjoy MEN IN BLACK.  It is an extremely fun
film that you will want to see again.  Although it runs a very quick and
speedy 96 minutes, the entire film from beginning to end is a non-stop
adventure.  The ending of the film, which ties up a few loose ends for one
of the main characters, is also very well done.  A sequel is already being
planned, so there is more to look forward to!


Author
Brian Koller
"Men in Black" is a black comedy.  It stars Tommy Lee Jones
as a member of a quasi-government agency that monitors and
occasionally tangles with the aliens among us.  You may not
have been aware of it, but for decades now aliens from all
over the galaxy have been on earth, although most of them are 
in Manhattan.  Jones recruits energetic cop Will Smith,
whose performance is much more winning than in "Independence
Day", the last time Smith got the best of trouble-making aliens.
Smith and Jones get to dress in cool black suits, drive an
impressive car that definitely does not have a Ford engine,
and fire small weapons that pack an enormous punch.  It's all
in good fun, and there job is made easier in that most of
the aliens are OK.  As Jones says, "they're just trying to
make a living like the rest of us."  By the way, "Men in
Black" reveals that Sylvestor Stallone is an alien.  
I knew it!
But there's a bad apple in every lot.  An alien labelled
"the bug" crash-lands on Earth and begins a vendetta against
a rival alien race, threatening life on Earth as we know.
Smith and Jones are on the case.  Linda Fiorentino, looking
lovely but out of place, enters the story as a morgue doctor.
Aliens dead or alive don't seem to upset her much.
While often entertaining and even funny, I can't give 
"Men in Black" a high grade.  Smith and Jones are just fine
and are given some good lines, but there is a cartoonish
feel to the story, and the depth just isn't there.
Perhaps it would help if the aliens' characters were fleshed
out, or if Fiorentino had a credible character, or if
the agents had family members who were endangered.  Anything
that would create conflict, drama or tension.  A final
complaint is the villian is a clumsy, mumbling clod that
doesn't inspire fear, loathing, laughs or even interest.
No wonder the story focuses on the derring-do of the agents.
Smith's training is limited to a one-hour tryout, surprising
given his level of responsibility.
So, if you want to see a black comedy, rent "Army of Darkness"
instead.  It is funnier, and has more gore and violence that is 
key to the genre.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
The highest-grossing movie of the summer of 1997, and the film that
most recently (as of the 3rd week of August, 1998) surpassed PULP
FICTION (7.5/10) as the most rented movie of the 1990's, MEN IN BLACK
marked the second consecutive summer in which Will Smith helmed the
summer-blockbuster king (He starred in 1996's INDEPENDENCE DAY (6/10)
as well.)
PLOT:
About 1500 aliens looking like humans, live amongst us on Earth (Most
of them in New York. Who knew?) A top-secret agency called the Men In
Black (MIB) monitor and police these creatures' every movement to
ensure that the public never finds out about them. One day, a "bug"
alien lands on Earth, and suddenly, the destruction of our planet may
be near. 
CRITIQUE:
Light, plotless, easy-to-digest science-fiction comedy that continues
to show off the comedic talents of Will Smith, some great straight man
sense by Tommy Lee Jones, and the hip special effects of the group at
Industrial, Light and Magic. Steven Spielberg executive produced this
brain-munch, while the man behind GET SHORTY (7.5/10) and the ADDAMS
FAMILY films, Barry Sonnenfeld, directed this venture. This movie left
no definable marks on my intellect, but did manage to blow by me real
quick (90 minutes to be exact), keep me awake, mostly interested, and
generally amused throughout its entire runtime.
I was somewhat disappointed in the fact that I had already seen most of
the cool special effect shots in the film's trailer, but I guess the
one-liners from Will Smith still managed to keep me in the game. I also
liked the "feel" of the movie, which was never more serious than it
needed to be. Just fluffy enough not to take seriously, and never real
enough for anyone to complain about the lame plot. One thing that I did
find extremely irritating and overdone, was Vincent D'Onofrio's
exaggerated cramps, cricks and overall disgustingness. If this was
supposed to be funny, it sure didn't work on me. All it did was make me
nervous and feel like itching. Admirable in regards to the actor's
physical capabilities, but unfunny in regards to its cinematic outcome.
The cutest things in this picture were the little "worm" aliens that
spoke in Mexican accents and were last seen carrying cartons of
Marlboro cigarettes through the alien airport on their way back home.
They should have expanded their roles in the film. On a sad note, a
virtual tear was brought to my eye when I saw, the one time decent
respected actress, Linda Fiorentino, degrade herself in a throwaway
role that makes any other throwaway roles look respectable (see Little
Known Facts below to discover her "clever" way of being cast in this
movie.) She delivered her useless lines in a dry "only here for the
paycheck" kind of way, and had no problem showing off her gams for the
duration of the entire picture (Why Sonnenfeld felt the need to keep
showing her hanging from a tree in a short skirt over and over, during
the denouement of this kid's film, I'll never know....well, actually I
do know, but I digress.) Overall, the film is easy enough to watch,
short enough not to have you care about the lame 1-2-3 plot, and funny
enough to make you smile if you're feeling blue.
Little Known Facts: 
Linda Fiorentino won her part in MEN IN BLACK in a poker game from
director Barry Sonnenfeld (I would have forfeited the game if I had
been her.) Besides the part in the movie, she won around $1200.
Chris O'Donnell was first offered the role of J (Eventually played by
Will Smith.)
In this film, the "known aliens" visible on the screen include
Sylvester Stallone, Dionne Warwick, Newt Gingrich, motivational
big-jawed guru Anthony Robbins, George Lucas, and executive producer
Steven Spielberg.
The joke told by K (Tommy Lee Jones) at the restaurant that ends in the
ambiguous punchline, "...yeah, but this one's eatin' my popcorn!" is
the same strange joke told by the stand-up comic at the burlesque show
in 1973's THE STING (7/10).
Barry Sonnenfeld started his career directing porn films. He's quoted
in the January 26, 1998 Newsweek magazine (page 60) as saying that he
was depressed when he heard that BOOGIE NIGHTS (7.5/10) was being made
(a film about making pornos) because he had wanted to make a movie
about the time he shot 9 feature length pornos in nine days. Barry had
been offered the job of directing FORREST GUMP (7.5/10), but declined.
The job then went to Robert Zemeckis who won an Academy Award for it.
Barry Sonnenfeld was the cinematographer on three Coen brother movies
including RAISING ARIZONA (8/10), BLOOD SIMPLE (8/10) and MILLER'S
CROSSING (7/10). Other films in her arsenal of cinematographic
experience include WHEN HARRY MET SALLY (9/10), BIG (7/10), THROW MOMMA
FROM THE TRAIN (7.5./10) and MISERY (8/10).
Tommy Lee Jones received a B.A. in English literature and graduated cum
laude from Harvard, 1969. That is where he roomed with future
Vice-President of the United States, Al Gore, and according to author
Erich Segal, the duo were the models for the character of Oliver in
LOVE STORY. Tommy has never taken an acting class. 

Author
Chris Casino
CAST: Will Smith, Tommy Lee Jones, Linda Fiorentino, Vincent D'Nofrio, Carol Struyken, 
Rip Torn.
I never liked Will Smith as the Fresh Prince, his show was likable but that wasn't his 
doing. As an actor, however, I admire and respect this man, and MEN IN BLACK
makes me admire and respect him more.
I'd seen Will Smith on Jay Leno the night before I saw it. He told you not to go in 
expecting INDEPENDENCE DAY II, which is what people may expect when they go in to see 
this, and admittedly, I'd gone into the theater expecting it, thinking,"Jay Leno
likes Dennis Rodman, so how often is he right?" But this is not INDEPENDENCE DAY II,
it's very different, and that's what's so appealing about it.
Don't get me wrong, I was part of the half of the country that loved ID4, but the
appeal of this film is that Will Smith choses a different type of alien movie here
and doesn't *entirely* typecast himself, and that shows he's good at picking scripts.
Smith plays Agent Jay, a young MIB recruited by Agent Kay (an impressive Tommy Lee
Jones, who works surprisingly well with Smith), a grizzled MIB who's fought aliens
of all shapes and sizes. Anyhow, the plot deals with a giant bug-like alien (D'Nofrio)
who comes to Earth in human form and possesses a farmer in search of a device
which is the key to universal peace. Used in his hands, it can be a weapon
that will destroy Earth in a certain amount of time, unless Jay and Kay recover
it, with the help of a female Doctor (Fiorentino).
This movie tries a lot of different stuff, comedy, SF, and buddy cop movie stuff,
all three of which work well. It mostly concentrates on the buddy cop relationship 
between Smith and Jones, and that's why this movie treats itself like a buddy cop action 
movie, but it also deals with our fears about weird people that we don't know about.
It explores the theory,"What if all the weird people you know are aliens?" Case
in point, when Fiorentino says to Smith at the end,"The Emperor of Allariua wants
tickets to the Bulls game," he replies,"Let's put in some calls to Dennis Rodman,
he's from that planet." If *that* guy wouldn't pass as an alien, I dunno who 
would! 
So if you refuse to see this movie because it's another alien movie with Smith and you 
hated ID4 to begin with, give it a shot, it deserves it, it's worth it, and it's very 
different.

Author
Homer Yen
Did you ever wonder if Dennis Rodman was actually from this planet?  Or   
if Sylvester Stallone was some kind of weird extra-terrestrial?  I used   
to think that about my 7th grade English teacher, Ms. Carey.  But after   
seeing this movie, they may have confirmed my suspicions.
As the story goes, at any time, there are over a thousand aliens living   
among us here on Earth.  The Men in Black  (MiB) are the watchdogs that   
oversee the cosmic citizens, guardians of our beloved planet from   
nasty-tempered aliens, and secret service to the stars.  Based in New   
York City (where weird is the norm), the MiB organization gives  human   
form to our space-faring emigrants so that they may walk and live among   
us unnoticed.  But to enforce the laws of Earth, the MiB carry weapons   
that are powerful enough to meet or exceed destruction quotas in one   
single blast.  They carry other-worldly technology to erase people's   
short-term memory when common folk see the MiB in action.  And their best   
leads on cosmic things-gone-awry are the supermarket tabloids.
Little do we know that there are much stronger battles of good v. evil   
going on in the depths of space.  One of the aliens-as-human on this   
planet is an important diplomat that is carrying something very precious.   
 It holds the 'key', literally, to universal peace.  A giant   
cockroach-like alien soon arrives on the planet and steals this 'key'.   
 In the wrong alien hands (flippers? mandibles? tentacles?), it can be   
used as a weapon.  Therefore, it must be recovered and returned to it's   
rightful owners.  Otherwise, to ensure universal safety, Earth will be   
destroyed, along with the 'key'.  Now, it's the MiB who must prevent this   
catastrophe.  The MiB agents on the case are "K", played by Tommy Lee   
Jones.  He is crustier than burnt toast and even more serious than Al   
Gore.  The stars in the sky no longer spark wonder in his eyes.  He is   
accompanied by a flippant rookie, "J", played by Will Smith.
But, despite this shoot-em-up, protect-Earth-from-destruction premise,   
this is nothing at all like a typical summer action movie.  And, this   
isn't an Independence Day knockoff.  Rather, this is a stylishly offbeat   
sci-fi comedy that pokes fun at what the government always denies Í that   
there are real aliens that live here, and that the government does its   
darndest to cover them up.  But to give it some sense of excitement and   
to keep it within the parameters of the summer movie recipe, there must   
be some kind of earth-hangs-in-the-balance scenario.
Yet, this movie is very appealing.   The abundance of wierdness (talking   
aliens, pee-wee atomizers, a mortician who 'lives' for her work, and lots   
of yucky bugs and slime-splattering galore), is played straight, like as   
if this were normal (of course, we are in NYC).  It gives it a deadpan   
feel, which makes it all the more funnier and odder.  Jones plays the   
venerable seen-it-all agent with seriousness and maturity.  Smith is   
likeable and makes a great comic partner to Jones' straight man routine.   
 They click like Dorothy's ruby red shoes.  The look and feel of the   
movie is made even better with direction from Barry Sonnenfeld (The   
Addam's Family). This guy has a knack for 'gothic' comedy, and   
successfully transfers his macabre sense of humor onto the screen.  And,   
an appropriate dose of special effects helps to bolster the oddness of   
their task without diverting attention from the human actors.  The story   
moves well, and before you know it, the end credits are already rolling!   
 The result is 100 minutes worth of fun in the form of Ewwwws and   
Blechhhs, Aaaahhhs and Wows.  Let the Men in Black protect and color your   
world.

Author
Vance Scott
Tommy-lee Jones, and Will Smith star in this quirky comedy about the 
trials of Kay, and Jay two agents of the mysterious Men In Black agency. 
The concept of Men In Black is a winner, and is a ripe play ground for a 
science fiction comedy. The supporting characters come across as hollow, 
and cardboard. Although the film's weak supporting characters have more 
to do with poor writing than acting. Tommy-lee Jones, and Will Smith are 
engaging, and entertaining. The characters Kay, and Jay provide an 
excellent vehicle for Tommy-lee Jones, and Will Smith to show off their 
comedic talent. The rest of the movie was some what dull, and lacking in 
imagination. The plot focuses on Kay, and Jay's attempt to stop an 
intergalactic cockroach from capturing a minature galaxy placed in 
a gemstone located on earth. The exploits of the villain a 15 foot tall 
cockroach is largely a waste of film footage, and the audience's time. 
The villain fails to frighten, or amuse. The only thing the villain 
brings to the story is an excuse for the Men In Black to have an 
adventure. Hollywood has produced a mediocre film, a step up from this 
summer's losers. The only thing we can hope is that Hollywood will 
realize that good writing is important to a movie's success, and next 
summers movies will improve. I suspect that if screen writers started to 
get the recognition they deserve good, or bad screen plays would improve.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith, Linda Fiorentino, Rip Torn, 
      Vincent D'Onofrio, Tony Shalhoub
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Producers: Walter F. Parkes and Laurie MacDonald
Screenplay: Ed Solomon based on the comic book by Lowell Cunningham
Cinematography: Donald Peterman
Music: Danny Elfman
U.S. Distributor: Columbia Pictures
     Have you ever seen a tabloid headline like this:  "Woman gives 
birth to son of six-headed alien"?  MEN IN BLACK, the new science 
fiction comedy from cinematographer-turned-director Barry Sonnenfeld 
(GET SHORTY), postulates that such stories are not the result of fertile 
imaginations, but accurate representations of the truth.  You see, ever 
since the 1960s, Earth has become an intergalactic hideout for aliens in 
need of a place to lie low for a while.  Currently, there are over 1500 
visitors, most in New York City (based on personal experience, that 
number may be low), and their ranks include such high-profile names as 
Sylvester Stallone (he obviously had trouble mastering the language), 
Newt Gengrich (guess what he looks like in his natural form), and Dennis 
Rodman (who knew?).
     MEN IN BLACK is Will Smith's second consecutive motion picture 
close encounter of the third kind.  Here, instead of engaging in ship-
to-ship dogfights with creatures ripped off from ALIEN, he's using 
Series 4 De-atomizers to blast giant cockroaches.  As Jay, he's the 
latest recruit of the ultra-secret sixth division of the INS (the "Men 
in Black" of the title) -- a group of government workers in charge of 
licensing and regulating the presence of non-Earthborn aliens.  His 
partner, Kay (Tommy Lee Jones), is a venerable agent who knows the ropes 
and is willing to give lessons.  Together, the pair go in search of an 
intergalactic assassin (played in human form by Vincent D'Onofrio) whose 
unauthorized activities on Earth could result in the planet's 
destruction.
     In many ways, MEN IN BLACK is the movie that MARS ATTACKS! wanted 
to be, but wasn't.  This is a snappy, clever, often-funny motion picture 
that provides the perfect blend of science fiction-style action with 
comic dialogue.  The screenplay, credited to Ed Solomon (and based on 
the Marvel comic book by Lowell Cunningham) has a sly, sophisticated 
edge that many blockbuster scripts lack.  Sonnenfeld's direction is 
crisp and the editing is tight, resulting in a film that clocks in at a 
mere ninety-five minutes, which proves to be a nearly-perfect length.
     That's not to say that the movie is of masterpiece status, or even 
light on flaws.  There are plenty of minor problems along the way, and 
the ending is somewhat rushed and anticlimactic.  On the whole, however, 
viewers are less likely to remember the glitches than the clever one-
liners, subtle parodies, and effective use of visual effects to 
integrate aliens into everyday existence.  MEN IN BLACK's deliciously 
unconventional spirit lends a refreshing twist to a premise that has 
fueled numerous conspiracy theory movies and one currently-popular 
television series.
     The chief pleasure of MEN IN BLACK isn't being dazzled by the 
special effects, but enjoying the deadpan performances of Tommy Lee 
Jones (whose offhand attitude towards the most bizarre events would make 
Jack Webb proud) and Will Smith.  This is a rare case when the multi-
million dollar, computer-generated creatures don't upstage their real-
life co-stars.  Smith and Jones are a fine pair, and the film's focus on 
them never wavers.  However, while the two leads can't complain about 
screen-time, the supporting players have all been short-changed.  Linda 
Fiorentino, who gets third billing, is vastly underused, appearing only 
peripherally throughout.  Vincent D'Onofrio (as the bad alien's human 
host) and Rip Torn (as Zed, the leader of the Men in Black) don't fare 
much better.  
     A word of caution for those who expect to see INDEPENDENCE DAY 2:  
despite the attempts of certain marketing campaigns to link the two, 
they're vastly different in scope and intent.  MEN IN BLACK is an 
outright comedy (in fact, some of its satire is directed at movies like 
last year's box office champ), not a pastiche of worn sci-fi/adventure 
elements, and there's no big space battle to be found.  In fact, from 
the opening credits to the closing ones, our heroes stay firmly rooted 
on terra firma.  Those accepting MEN IN BLACK for what it is will likely 
agree that this is one of 1997's more satisfying big-budget offerings.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
As I walked towards the exit after the sneak preview of "Men In Black", I 
bumped into a buddy of mine. We stood in the aisle with big, dumb grins 
on our faces, like giddy children, gushing praise over the utterly 
delightful film we'd just experienced. After suffering through weeks of 
one summer mega-dud after another, it was exhilarating to finally see a 
movie that paid-off as richly as this one did. Not only were we eager to 
see "MiB" again as soon as possible, we actually found ourselves talking 
about how cool the SEQUEL would be.
"MiB" is a smart, breezy, very funny amalgam of "Ghostbusters" and "The X-
Files", with a little "Pulp Fiction" and "Dragnet" thrown in to boot. The 
premise is simple. For decades, aliens have been using our backwater 
little planet as an intergalactic getaway; a nice spot for a fresh start 
and a good place to hide. "Ever see the movie Casablanca?'", says Agent 
K (Tommy Lee Jones), "We're sort of the same thing, only without Nazis." 
K is one of the MiB, super-secret government agents in charge of all 
activities related to the immigration and policing of extraterrestrials. 
When K's partner decides to retire, a group of men are recruited as 
possible replacements. One member of the group, a brash young New York 
cop (Will Smith), emerges as the clear stand-out and, in short order, 
becomes K's new partner, J. 
What makes "MiB" so hilarious is the remarkably deadpan, matter-of-fact 
tone of the ultra-smooth agents. K, his boss Zed (Rip Torn), and the 
other MiB deal with the incredibly bizarre goings-on without ever raising 
an eyebrow. Dressed in black suits, white shirts and Ray Bans, these guys 
are the epitome of retro-cool. Saving the world from giant insect-like 
psychoshey, it's just part of a day's work.
The aliens live among us, by the way. You know those particularly odd 
people you encounter, the ones who seem a little too weird to be real? 
Well, according to "MiB", they're not. Those folks are aliens 
masquerading as humans, trying to get a feel for their new forms. As the 
MiB monitors reveal, many of our more "unique" well-known citizens are 
actually aliens in disguise. This theory, incidentally, could go a long 
way towards explaining Regis and Kathy Lee.
The aliens in "MiB" are amazing to behold; wonderfully imaginative 
creatures that blend seamlessly with the live performers. But this is one 
movie where dazzling special effects don't outshine the actors. Bug-eyed 
monsters be damned, this show belongs to Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith. 
Smith is an beguiling Everyman, with style and attitude to spare, but 
Tommy Lee Jones steals the picture in one of the best performances of his 
career. His craggy features and steely expression make the outrageous 
seem normal. His droll, laconic delivery is absolutely dead-on. But 
beneath his Ray Bans are the eyes of a man who has suffered. The 
sacrifice K made when he dedicated his life to MiB weighs heavy on his 
spirit and Jones has wistful, reflective moments that one rarely sees in 
this sort of rollicking comedy. Jones is both the anchor and the heart of 
the film.
Sharp direction from Barry Sonnenfeld ("Get Shorty") and crisp, tight 
editing result in a movie that races by, clocking in at an efficient 97 
minutes. What a relief to see a summer blockbuster that understands the 
old adage "less is more". 
"MiB" is not without flaws. After a spectacular beginning, the film sags 
just a bit in the middle section, as K & J's investigation of an 
rampaging alien becomes a little too down to earth. A subplot involving 
Linda Fiorentino as an insightful and sexually assertive medical examiner 
is underdeveloped and, at the end of the film, Will Smith's J still seems 
too inexperienced for the huge responsibilities thrust upon him. 
These are minor quibbles, though. The bottom line is that "MiB" is an 
absolute hoot, a fully realized sci-fi detective comedy with a sublime 
sense of cool. Other movies, notably "Mars Attacks!" and "The Adventures 
Of Buckaroo Banzai", have captured this ironic-hip sensibility, but lost 
the mainstream audience along the way. "MiB" should not suffer their fate.
 With its little green flippers firmly on the pulse of the public's 
tastes, "MiB" should easily become one of the years biggest hits. What's 
even better, it deserves to be.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        Last year at this time, the number-one box office attraction 
was INDEPENDENCE DAY, featuring a wise-cracking Will Smith 
battling aliens. This year at this time, the number-one box office 
attraction is MEN IN BLACK, featuring a wise-cracking Will Smith 
battling aliens. History repeats itself. I repeat myself. Both movies 
are effects-driven action romps that play much better in a packed 
multiplex on a huge screen. The flaws, I'm sure, shine through a lot 
brighter if you're home by yourself watching it on your 13" Sony.
        The plot of MEN IN BLACK is simplified to an almost 
Corky-like point -- funded by but independent from the U.S. 
government is a super-secret organization that tracks and controls 
extra-terrestrial activity. A group of Armani-suit-clad men in black 
carry out the peaceful and violent tasks of the organization, although 
for plot purposes, we only see the violent ones.
        Tommy Lee Jones, pretty much reprising his character in 
THE FUGITIVE, is the no-nonsense veteran of alien battle. Will 
Smith, absolutely reprising his ID4 character, is the young, cocksure 
cop recruited by Jones toward the beginning, after Jones sees him 
chase down an alien on foot. Smith doesn't know it's an alien, of 
course, and once he finds out his memory of it is erased by Jones 
with a gizmo that comes in handy for anyone with something to 
cover up. Clinton would never have been sued by Paula Jones if he 
had one.
        Smith and Jones are out to track down an insect alien 
inhabiting Vincent D'Onofrio's human body. The alien is after some 
diamonds that turn up on a dead alien body attended to by kinky 
morgue worker Linda Fiorentino. She's in the movie, as always, to 
add a little sex appeal, although her flirtatious scenes with Smith 
mostly fall flat. It's her unsurprising but still interesting turn as the 
film's third hero that elevates her from being just another movie 
sexpot.
        Rick Baker, hot off his plumper work in THE NUTTY 
PROFESSOR, does the alien effects here. A lot of them are 
standard-issue "creature" aliens, like the oversized beatle that serves 
as the movie's villain. There are weird-looking but harmless Cantina 
band types and a few nice touches, like the talking pug that steals a 
scene about halfway through the movie. The effects aren't 
groundbreaking, or really even that special, but they do help keep 
the movie entertaining.
        The best thing about MEN IN BLACK is the men in black -- 
Smith and Jones. They have so much fun with their roles that we 
have fun watching them. The movie also has enough constant 
one-liners that it seems more comedy at times than action, like a 
modern-day GHOSTBUSTERS. The downside to it all, and this is 
what separates it from the far-superior and far-funnier 
GHOSTBUSTERS, is it's incredibly low-brow. For every funny line 
there's a lame one, and the plot is transparent. If you have a brain, 
leave it at the door or under the seat, because it will only get in the 
way of your fun. If you don't have a brain, you can't read this 
anyway.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Author
Scott Renshaw
MEN IN BLACK
(Columbia)
Starring:  Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith, Linda Fiorentino, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Rip Torn.
Screenplay:  Ed Solomon, based on the comic book by Lowell Cunningham.
Producers:  Walter F. Parkes and Laurie MacDonald.
Director:  Barry Sonnenfeld.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  98 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     If BATMAN & ROBIN arrived as the summer film everyone was ready to
hate, MEN IN BLACK arrived as the film everyone was ready to love.  This
was to be the antidote to a season filled with moribund sequels and
lackluster high concepts, a cinematic life preserver for movie-goers
drowning in over-promoted and under-developed bilge water blockbusters.
It would bring together an appealing rising star, a savvy veteran
character actor, an idiosyncratic director, a clever concept and fun
visual effects.  This, at last, would be something worth standing in line
for.
     MEN IN BLACK the movie -- as opposed to MEN IN BLACK the
much-anticipated event -- isn't worth standing in line for.  It's a
frisky, fairly enjoyable summer fantasy, one which avoids the common
big-budget trap of over-staying its welcome.  At the same time, it's a bit
disappointing, and for an unexpected reason.  MEN IN BLACK has been edited
to the point where scenes collide awkwardly, where attempts at sub-plots
cry out for more development.  It's a film which actually _under_-stays
its welcome.
     That says a lot for what is on the screen for just over 90 minutes.
The story, based on the comic book series by Lowell Cunningham, deals with
a top-secret government agency called the Men in Black.  Their
responsibility is overseeing the earth's alien population -- alien, as in
the extra-terrestrial kind -- as well as keeping the existence of those
aliens secret from the general population.  Tommy Lee Jones plays a
veteran MiB known only as Agent K who brings in New York cop James Edwards
(Will Smith) as a new recruit.  The newly-christened Agent J soon
discovers that he has come aboard at a particularly bad time, as one
foul-tempered alien visitor arrives on a mission which could spell the
destruction of the planet.
     When director Barry Sonnenfeld plays that premise for its most
outrageous and witty comic possibilities, MEN IN BLACK is a whole lot of
fun.  Jones and Smith have a solid rapport in a variation on the standard
buddy-cop pairing, turning in performances which are knowing without
winking too obviously at the audience.  Their supporting cast is sharp as
well, particularly Vincent D'Onofrio in a hilarious turn as the sadistic
alien Bug who inhabits the skin of a redneck farmer; D'Onofrio's physical
movements are even more hideously other-worldly than Rick Baker's make-up
effects.  The grandest, goofiest moments involve MiB Headquarters,
rendered by Bo Welch's production design and Eric Brevig's visual effects
as a cross between Kennedy Airport, Ellis Island and Mos Eisley Spaceport.
When a bank of television monitors show "known aliens" including Newt
Gingrich, Dionne Warwick and Sylvester Stallone, you know that MEN IN
BLACK will proceed with tongue firmly in cheek.
     That wry charm, along with the collected talent in MEN IN BLACK,
should have been enough to justify the hype.  And so they might have been,
if Sonnenfeld had put together a film with a momentum to match its
moments.  The plot races from place to place so quickly that you're never
given a chance to piece it together.  K's recruitment of J is handled
awkwardly, attempts at creating an emotional core in K's pining over his
lost love feel rushed and unnecessary, and Linda Fiorentino (as a coroner
caught up in the alien shenanigans) never develops a character.  As a
collection of amusing individual scenes, MEN IN BLACK is just fine.  It
just never makes sense when precious minutes are devoted to half-hearted
attempts at character development.
      It's not fair to call MEN IN BLACK unsatisfying, because there's a
lot of great stuff in it.  It does, however, feel unfinished; it's great
stuff not yet formed into a great movie.  More to the point, it functions
best as a set-up for -- oh bitter irony -- yet another big-budget summer
sequel.  Only when compared to its current competition is it the summer
masterpiece everyone was ready for it to be.

Author
Matt Petras
Rating: *** out of ****
Length: 98 min (1:38 hours)
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Producer(s): Laurie MacDonald, Steven R. Molen, Walter F. Parkes,
Graham Place, Steven Spielberg
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith, Linda Fiorentino, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Rip Torn, Tony Shalhoub
        Aliens!! Well, that is what this movie is about. Computer
generated aliens. OK, the movie is not just about computer generated
aliens. It's about computer generated aliens and a secret organization
known as MIB. If one wasn't green and running around the other would
not exist as it's known. The computer graphics in this movie are
spectacular, they make you want to believe that aliens like the ones
depicted exits. Since seeing this movie I have to agree concede that
Denis Rodman is an alien, he simply has to be. Well, in all
seriousness the aliens created here are not only of the monster
variety but are also of the soft, squishy and cuddly kind. Just adds
something of a lighter note to the movie where it could have become
very dark.  
        Along with aliens comes the humor and in a pretty decent way.
J, well soon to be J, a smart ass cop(played by Will Smith) runs down
what he thinks is a would-be villain and gets some attention from the
MIB and K in particular. K aims to recruit our poor J, but that is not
the whole point of this movie. The main duty of the MIB is to police
the extra terrestrials on earth who have chosen it as a home or a
refuge. That's also the main point of this movie: protect the earth
from the scum of the galaxy. Some of the scum from space is awfully
bad and just down right nasty. Color commentary abounds when forced to
deal with alien scum and none other than Will Smith and Tommy Lee
Jones are there to deliver the punch. The dialogue is witty to say the
least. This wittiness lets the movie flow well from scene to scene
developing the characters to the extent needed for this movie. 
        Tommy Lee Jones(as K) and Will Smith(as J) provide both the
action and the comedy beautifully. The characters they play don't seem
to be wrong in any way nor does their performance as them. I would
have to say that K is more amusing than J, but what's one without the
other. Both roles complemented each other very well and the script
seemed to be written for these two actors. The story also goes deep
enough to provide a proper background so the audience is not totally
clueless. Altogether good performances were put in by all the cast and
the director blended everything marvelously with the necessary special
effects to create a good movie. A movie well worth seeing if you are
up for some lighthearted and witty humor. 
        As most movies have their good things they also have their bad
things. The character development in this movie was not all that grand
because it didn't need to be. But if there was more character
development and if there was some development of the alien characters
that might have added quite considerable to the movie. Especially the
evil alien, he did need some work. Though this could have been worked
on, the movie was what it proposed to be a rather shallow and witty
comedy. That was achieved rather well, with some interesting
commentary and observations. A movie worth a view, but keep in mind
what the movie is and if you are not fond of Will Smith's form of
humor then I wouldn't go. 
Originally written after original release. 
Totally rewritten December 26, 1997


Author
Jamie Peck
Columbia / 1:38 / 1997 / PG-13 (violence, language, crude humor)
Cast: Cast: Tommy Lee Jones; Will Smith; Linda Fiorentino; Rip Torn; 
Vincent D'Onofrio; Siobhan Fallon; Tony Shalhoub 
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld 
Screenplay: Ed Solomon 
A July 4 weekend opening date. Will Smith battling aliens. A moniker 
alias composed of three characters. It must be the gospel truth to say 
that Columbia Pictures is hoping their "Men in Black" conjures up 
memories of last summer's mega-hit "Independence Day." Alas, it does, 
but in an unexpected way -- both films bear the mark of being vastly 
disappointing, although "MiB" doesn't ever come close to the 
mind-numbing awfulness of "ID4." 
So hip it practically demands that you like it, "Men in Black" fails to 
surprise -- probably due to its heavily-pushed ad campaign. If you've 
seen the trailers, you've also seen most of the movie, a sad 
miscalculation that makes "MiB" feel less like a film than a 98-minute 
commercial for itself. But it's still no bore -- occasionally, there's 
wicked whimsy to be found, most of it likely spun from the hand of 
director and black comedy maestro Barry Sonnenfeld. 
Tommy Lee Jones exercises his bravura deadpan skill here as Agent K, a 
member of the top secret titular government sect whose job it is to 
monitor and regulate the on-Earth presence of intergalactic visitors. 
While K is showing the ropes to recently-recruited Agent J (Will Smith, 
displaying the same matter-of-fact cockiness that was the best thing 
about "ID4"), a terrorist bug crashes by a rural farmhouse, inhabits the 
body of nasty redneck Edgar (Vincent D'Onofrio) and sets into motion a 
diabolical plan that involves the theft of a golf ball-sized galaxy and 
the slaughter of an alien ambassador presently on the planet in human 
trappings. 
"Men in Black" is most fun when it expands on the events unfolding 
between J and K. Smith's training session (where it is revealed that Al 
Roker, Dionne Warwick and Dennis Rodman are, uh, not of this world) is a 
subtle, jokey riot. The sequences where J and K talk to Edgar's 
understandably distraught wife (Siobhan Fallon) -- and afterwards, erase 
her mind of the preceding events with a neat little gadget called a 
neuralyzer -- and interrogate an extraterrestrial informant in a very 
unusual disguise bring on the few belly laughs that "MiB" offers. The 
rest of the movie is definitely watchable, but could have achieved much 
higher ground had the ensuing development not been delivered with such a 
strong feeling of deja vu. 
The capable cast does what they can whenever Ed Solomon's screenplay -- 
based on a cult comic, by the way -- lags. It's great fun to see Jones 
interacting with other species with the same kind of laid-back serenity 
with which your typical person greets the mailman. Also effective is Rip 
Torn as the MiB overseer, but Linda Fiorentino is a tad underused as a 
mortician -- you can predict her character's inevitable destination as 
soon as she's been introduced. D'Onofrio, a little-known actor usually 
cast in small, independent films, gets suitably weirder as his carcass 
decomposes. 
Had "Men in Black" kept secretive some of its strange creatures, then 
it'd be worth talking about. But as it stands, everything is foolishly 
foreshadowed, including a cadaver whose noggin pops open to reveal a 
mini alien and J's finale boxing match with a giant cockroach (which 
makes little sense). In the long run, the snappy dialogue ("The cab 
drivers on this planet are terrible," laments one weary space traveler) 
is far spiffier than any of the sights. "Men in Black" is more 
dissatisfying in immediate afterthought than in week-old retrospect, but 
relish what's good about it while you can -- as other big summer 
attractions pop up, you'll feel like someone flashed a neuralyzer at 
you. What color were they again? 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Author
Chad Polenz
1997, PG-13, 98 minutes [1 hour, 38 minutes]
starring: Tommy Lee Jones (Agent K), Will Smith (James Edwards/Agent J),
Linda Fiorentino (Dr. Laurel Weaver), Vincent D'Onofrio (Edgar - The Bug);
written by Ed Solomon; produced by Laurie MacDonald, Walter F. Parkes;
directed by Barry Sonnenfeld; based on the comic book and characters created
by Lowell Cunningham.
Seen Sunday, November 2, 1997 at 3:15 p.m. at Crossgates Cinema 12 (Albany,
NY), with my brother John for $5.
Movies geared towards massive audiences tend not to be that complicated or
have that much intelligence to them. Americans especially don't like to watch
things they don't have to think too much about. What's good about "Men In
Black" is that, technically, it's another lightweight, mass-market
comedy/adventure, but it's also a very clever satire. It appeals to both the
child and the adult in us.
It's difficult to make a film that is intended for the family and can be
enjoyed by all members.  But this movie starts off well by displaying its
ability to do just that. The first scene depicts a truck full of illegal
immigrants which is stopped by highway patrolmen, until two men in black
suits show up and take over. Agent K (Jones) singles out one of the
immigrants and brings him back into the desert where his true identity is
revealed. He's an illegal alien all right - but he's from another planet and
he doesn't have a passport. 
The dialogue between K and the alien is cartoony, but witty, in a
"Simpson's" sort of way. Even though there's a slimy sight gag, it was built
up through satire, which shows how the comedy succeeds on many levels.
Satire derives its power from great acting. Anyone can write a joke, but it
takes talent to make subtle comedy funny. Tommy Lee Jones is fantastic here
as the Joe Friday-like Agent K. His sense of timing is perfect and his
deadpan delivery makes everything he says or does seem both serious and
funny. Then there's his counterpart, the always hyperactive Will Smith as
James Edwards - an NYPD officer who is asked to join "Men in Black" (the
secret agency K works for), because of an encounter he had with an alien.
 Many consider Smith a typecast actor who always plays characters like
himself - but it doesn't matter because he's hilarious! It seems like he
improvises every joke and gag, yet he never repeats himself.
The actual plot of the film involves some kind of pending inter-galactic war
with Earth in the middle. Agents J and K's job is to find a "bug" (D'Onofrio
as "Edgar") whose ship crash-landed on a farm in upstate New York. He has
made his way to NYC and wreaks havoc like a zombie in an Ed Wood movie, and
if they don't find him something terrible is going to happen. 
There's a lot of detail and attention given to the MIB operation, which not
only makes the satire even funnier and more clever, but shows how the film
doesn't cop-out where most others would. Everything the characters do has a
purpose, and there's actually a real sense of mystery here. At times I wasn't
quite sure what was going on, but because the story is so lighthearted I
never felt confused.
There's actually not much more to say about the film because the comedy is
so broad. It would be difficult to list even a few examples without
describing, in detail, the context in which they take place. Everything's
just plain fun, and the ending is a real hoot.
Special mention must be given to Linda Fiorentino as Dr. Laurel Weaver, the
sexy coroner who never plays the role of the damsel in distress nor the
butt-kicking, "strong-willed woman" stereotype. 
"Men In Black" is epitome what the summer blockbuster movie should be: it's
just plain fun.


Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Winsomely entertaining SF farce with two great performances. Too
bad it's all empty calories.
There is never a question that MEN IN BLACK is supposed to be sly,
on-the-one, and tongue-in-cheek. It is. It's a comic book for the kind of
people who wouldn't be caught dead reading one, and for that reason I felt a
little bit let down by it.
The premise is simple enough: it's a spinning-together of every
alien-related urban myth out there, with the Men In Black as the principal
protagonists. They're a corps of elite super-secret agents who police alien
activity on Earth, in exchange for the destruction of their identities.
Agent K (Tommy Lee Jones) is trolling for a new partner, and finds one in a
wiseass New York cop (Will Smith). (This is the second time in a row Smith
gets to deck an alien; when does Jones get his next shot?)
There are moments where the movie works hilariously. Smith, alias J, wonders
what the heck is up when he's asked to come into MIB HQ for an "entrance
exam"; the way the scene plays out is a mini-masterpiece of comedic set-ups
and payoffs, especially the shooting gallery. But then the movie starts to
take its flimsy plot seriously -- too seriously, as when it tries to get an
abhorrent amount of mileage out of a gigantic CGI cockroach.
This is undeniably amusing, but the funniest stuff in the movie seems to be
tucked away in the corners and crevices. Take, for instance, the whole bit
where the agents read the tabloid papers to get their latest scoops. That
begs a question all by itself: if the freakin' tabloids get this
information, then how come the MIBs have to hole up in their high-tech
headquarters and beg for scraps? That's only one example of how the movie
doesn't quite carry its thinking through to merciless and potentially
hilarious extremes. Instead we get a plot about a stolen galaxy (yes, a
stolen galaxy) that any member of the audience can figure out if they pay
attention. And there are several effects stuntpieces (like an alien
childbirth scene that ends exactly the way you'd expect, with the alien baby
urping up tons of luminescent goo all over Will Smith) that go on and on
until the joke is played painfully out. One of the surest signs that
cinematic comedy is dying is when every joke is allowed to run too much of a
course.
Yes, the movie is fun. Specifically, the actors are fun. Tommy Lee Jones, as
Agent K, fits into the role beautifully -- a lot more snugly than one of the
aliens in the movie trying to wear a corpse as a kind of disguse. Smith is
sidesplitting even in the tiniest moments; there's a bit where he totally
misinterprets everything a morgue doctor (Linda Fiorentino, also good) says.
But somehow it's all tell and no show. I went in expecting a good time, and
I got one, but I also got the sense they'd missed about twice as many
opportunities as they'd exploited.
I mentioned at the start of the review that this felt like a comic book for
the kind of people who wouldn't be caught dead reading one. If the folks who
made this think they were having the last word in weird and goofy, then they
should read SAM AND MAX.
LOCATION FOOTNOTE: This is the only movie set in New York where I've seen a
foot-chase begin near Grand Central Station and end, seconds later, at the
Guggenheim.

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Will Smith, Tommy Lee Jones and Vincent D'Onforio. 
Directed By Barry Sonnenfield
A Columbia Picture
Mr. Smith and Mr. Jones team up for yet another special
effect laden summer movie. And, like The Lost World,
this one isn't half bad. It centres more on the comedy and
characters than the special effects themselves, which is
damn good, and movies should follow this example! 
The Men in Black (MIB) are a agency which moniter extra
terristial life on Earth. However, these aliens don't LOOK
like aliens, they look like humans. At one point, a board
comes up showing who some of the aliens are, and these
include George Lucas and Sylvestor Stallone. A nice joke
there. Anyway, an evil alien, who steals D'Onforios skin, is
on a plot to take over the world. So, the MIB are called in
to stop this. 
What follows is 90 mins of non stop action and laughs. '90
minutes?' I hear you cry? Yes, thankfully, MIB is a very
short film. Not that it's too short. 90 minutes is the perfect
running time. It's not too much, and it's not too little.  Will
Smith does a good Eddie Murphy impression, and delivers
his jokes in his Fresh Prince style. Jones, however, does
his Leslie Nielson impression, and delivers his jokes in a
perfect deadpan way. These two comedic styles go
toghether prefectly. Rip Torn also gives a good
performance as their boss. One of the best performances is
D'Onforio. Watching him lumber around, in skin which is
too big for him, is hillarous. He dosen't say much, but he's
very, very good. However, Linda Fiorentino (The Last
Seduction, 1994) is dissapointing as a leggy coroner. Her
performance is good, but her part is hopelessly
underwritten. She just seems to be there to help with the
ending. The special effects, and the aliens created by Rick
Baker (The Nutty Professor, 1997) are excellent. 
This film may cause some trouble with easily scared
children. Although nowhere near as intense as The Lost
World, there are some scenes which could be scary, even
though they're not meant to be. So don't take the PG
rating lightly. The ending is probably the worse bit,
although they're little bits throughout which might upset
kids. Like most Spielberg adventure films, there are intense
scenes. If your child went through The Lost World OK,
though, or the Indiana Jones films, then they should get
through this OK. Overall though, I think only a few
children would be scared by this film. MIB, then, is highly
recommended. 

Author
Chuck Dowling
Men in Black (1997) ***1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith,
Linda Fiorentino, Rip Torn, Vincent D'onofrio. Directed by: Barry
Sonnenfeld. Running Time: 98 minutes.
Finally a decent summer movie has arrived. Not a great one, but decent. But
as far as the summer of 1997 is concerned, decent is equal to greatness.
"Men in Black" is probably this summer's most hyped film. In it, secret
government agents are responsible for monitoring all alien activity here on
earth. Yes, it seems aliens have been amongst us for years now. Smith is a
New York cop who unknowingly chases down an alien, and Jones recruits him to
join the secret organization.
The film does two things right, it's basic premise and the script. The
concept is refreshingly original and the dialogue is very funny. What it
fails at is character development and the actual story itself. Any details
of this secret organization are hardly mentioned, and we are led to believe
that there are only two actual agents in this group. Not much, but just a
tiny bit of development for the two main leads would have been nice.
As far as the meat of the story goes, an evil alien comes to earth to get a
little jewel or something he needs for some reason. That is how clear that
part gets. This evil alien, who earlier in the film is really built up to be
a forceful presence, crashes his ship into earth (if aliens are so advanced,
why are they always crashing into earth?) and attempts to use the body of a
farmer (D'onofrio) to blend in. I use the word "attempts" because for the
whole movie D'onofrio staggers around grotesquely disfigured because the
skin doesn't quite fit the alien's body, or the alien doesn't really have a
handle on how to use it. It's partly amusing to watch, but overall it seems
to defeat the purpose of even having a villain. Do we care if the slothing
mutant gets whatever it is he needs or if Jones and Smith stop him? There's
never any sense of danger whatsoever. You can make a zany movie like this
and still have a threat to deal with in the end, just take a look at
"Ghostbusters". And the film's final scenes are just plain wrong, as it goes
in all sorts of different directions, none of which did it need to go in.
Unfortunately, some of the special effects aren't created well, and do not
interact well with the scenes they are used in. The filmmakers should have
studied the computer effect techniques from "Mars Attacks!", as those are
still some of the most flawless interactive computer effects I've seen.
"Men in Black" does entertain however, despite it's flaws. Jones and Smith
have some great lines, and there's a scene where Jones forceably
interrogates a small dog that's one of the funniest things I've seen in a
long time. It's a fun flick, as summer movies should be. [PG-13]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
MEN IN BLACK ** 3/4 . Directed by  Barry Sonnenfeld. Produced by Walter F.
Parkes,
Laurie MacDonald.Screen Story and Screenplay by Ed Solomon.   Based on the
Malibu  comic by  Lowell Cunningham.Photography, Don Peterman. Editing, Jim
Miller. Production design, Bo Welch. Costumes,Mary E. Vogt. Visual Effects
Supervisor, Eric Brevig. Alien Make-Up Effects Rick Baker.
Co-Producer,Graham Place. Executive Producer, Steven Spielberg. Music,
Danny Elfman. Cast: Tommy Lee Jones (K),  Will Smith (J),  Linda Fiorentino
(Laurel), Vincent D'Onofrio (Edgar),  Rip Torn (Zed), Tony Shalhoub
(Jeebs), Siobhan Fallon (Beatrice), et al. An Amblin production released by
Columbia. 96 min. PG-13.
Will Smith's good looks and good timing, ironic mien and overall cool make
him a capital asset  of this yap and zap movie, along with Tommy Lee Jones
in what is probably his first out-and-out comic role, played
tongue-in-cheek, mostly deadpan, with a delivery of lines faster than any
character's in a Howard Hawks screwball entertainment.
MIB is a spoof of many things, primarily of sci-fi flicks and specifically
of nasty non-brothers from other planets. It also changes a "serious"
comic-book into comedy. Jones (whose name is K in a throwaway Kafka joke)
belongs to a  super-super-secret government outfit, so secret that other
agencies know of it. The Men in Black are after illegal aliens, nor your
garden variety undocumented Mexicans, Paraguyans, Antilleans, Nigerians or
former Sovietskis, but real E.T. aliens. In a spoof of census-taking, the
secret agents know that some 1,500 outer-spacers live in the USA.
Most are "good citizens" and are left alone. But the occasional bad 'uns,
destroyers in a mind-boggling variety of forms (such as nasty Spielbergian
gremlims, insect-like monsters, critters a la Alien, animals, ordinary
humans, and so on), have to be terminated with extreme prejudice.The
ingenious way K searches for them is by reading supermarket tabloids.
Clever and funny.
As his venerably-aged partner wishes to retire, K, looking for a
replacement, selects NYPD cop Smith, who becomes J. The two engage in a mad
series of comically vigorous feats.
The opening sequences are funny. The MIB secret immigration building is a
howl, especially as weird creatures are asked by Customs if they are
carrying forbidden fruit, vegretables and the like. Jones's patter (it
often reaches rhetorical heights) is very funny. Te neural neutralizer, a
gizmo that zaps selected periods of memory, is amusing. (To avoid its
effects the Men in Black wear dark, aptly named Ray-Ban glasses. That's the
best product placement in years).
Most funny too is when Will Jones is somehow led to a recruiting room of
the MIB yet has  no idea as to why he is there. Zed (the great Rip
Torn,good in any role, even the smallish one here)  administers a test to
the Best of the Best of the Best, all in uniform (they are the cream of the
military), bellowing cliches. Smith wears flamboyant street casuals.
An even funnie small gem is when, absurdly and unflappably, Smith takes the
written exam sitting in a  modernistic boothlike seat, with nothing to
place the questionnaire on, using a pencil that breaks and pierces sheets
of paper, yet coming out the victor.  that have no place on which to lie,
is a small gem. The scene was probably influenced by movies of the late
Francois Truffaut, in which schoolchildren have no end of problems with ink
and copybooks. (Elsewhere there are also middlin' funny throwaway
references to movies and  TV such as Sgt. Friday, Jeopardy, etc.)
Such passages, plus the two partners, are delightful. The other major
assets of the film are most imaginative photography and amazing special
effects that include morphing and transformations.
Now to the negatives. There is no true plot, unity or continuity. The movie
grows as, and into, a catch-all. There is a lack of logic and explanations,
even by crazy standards. Anything goes, anything is good for a gag or
verbal or visual joke, whether it's about  an E.T. squid baby to Dennis
Rodman, to goings on in the morgue, to a farmer's wife (no, not the usual
traveling salesman salacious jokes). Most work amusingly, but the
over-episodic structure, the arbitrariness of events, the unending yap and
zap, lessen the movie. Too much is too much and may, depending on the
viewer, start leading to tedium abetted by the unsolved problem of "how can
we end this picture?" Well, it just fizzles.
I grant you that it is not easy to parody sci-fi films, not just the funny
ones but those eager movies that, from a certain angle, are themselves
unconscious parodies. Even so, Men In Black is guilty of what is often a
central problem of the movies it spoofs: overkill.
As it runs 96 minutes, MIB might be given a cautious certificate of
membership in BBNMM,the famed organization Bring Back the Ninety Minute
Movies. With ten minutes cut and much tighter construction, MIB may even
have been a candidate for
a Certificate of Merit.

Author
Phil Brady
Men in Black is a really good idea for a summer movie. First, it
rides the crest of the X-Files/Roswell mystique, letting their publicity
sell the film. Conflicts with aliens means space ships, explosions, and
creature special effects, perfect for summer repeat business.  Add the
cachet of a graphic novel `comic book,' and you have an off-the-rack
winner. Mercifully, this property fell into the right hands (Spielberg's
Amblin), and didn't end up in the Hollywood sausage grinder. Barry
Sonnenfeld was a good choice as director. He had previously done the
Addams Family movies and Get Shorty. These films had their own peculiar
attitude as their primary strength, and Barry delivered them to the
screen intact. MIB has its own tude,  helped along by those box office
titans..Smith and Jones?
I wonder if the generic nature of the stars' names is a mere
coincidence, given that they play imperturbable, implacable cyphers.
Fact is, Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith both bring a lot of  talent and
charisma to their roles. Will Smith showed us his action/humor chops in
ID4, and he solidifies his ascendency here. Tommy doing comedy is a
surprise to some, but I don't know why. Comedy acting requires a
conviction to the story, letting the comedy come from the material, not
the actor's manner. Check out Tommy's Oscar-nominated turn in JFK, and
Oscar-winning role in The Fugitive.
Will plays a NYPD cop who falls down the rabbit-hole, into the
super-secret world of the MIB. These guys police the traffic of hundreds
of otherworld aliens that live here amongst us, and MIB hides them from
the locals. Earth is sort of a neutral port: `Think of  the movie
Casablanca,' Jones tells Will, `without the Nazis.' Jones becomes Will's
partner/mentor, dead serious as an MIB, but he betrays a capricious
sense of humor in the way he tosses Will into mind-blowing situations.
Tommy and boss Rip Torn never blink an eye as they matter-of-factly
discuss the latest end-of-Earth scenario. Their un-sensationalistic
manner is the implicit smirk that gives the movie its charm. It gives
contrast to Will's comic takes, as he and the audience find out that Sly
Stallone and Newt Gingrich, among others, are really aliens (Elvis,
too). And the MIB agency is autonomous, getting funding from its patents
on such borrowed alien technology as Velcro.
The main bug hunt involves an assassin sent to Earth to kill alien
royalty and capture a bauble he is guarding. Vincent D'Onofrio has a
great time playing the assassin, struggling to move about in the skin of
a farmer, who didn't look too good before the bug killed him. Imagine:
Terminator meets My Left Foot. As bodies pile up, they end in the
morgue, where Linda Fiorentino plays a coroner, puzzled by cadavers that
only appear to be human. Not the first time for her, but prior occasions
have been wiped from her memory by the neuralyzer, an MIB device that
erases the recent memories of people who witness alien events. This
little doodad gets a real workout in the MIB's normal day, and it gets
to be an anticipated punchline as the squares get corraled toward the
end of a scene.
Further humor ensues when Will lobbies Tommy not to use the
neuralyzer on the coroner yet again, fearing repeated use could be
harmful. Actually, he's kind of attracted to her, what with her being
Linda Fiorentino, and he doesn't want her to forget him, again. Turns
out that she unknowingly has possession  of the aforementioned bauble,
so she ends up drawn into a Kong-scales-the-Empire-State-Building ending
anyway. Not to worry. The bug is stopped, Earth is saved, and all
elements are in place for MIB II.
Men in Black delivers, probably better than any summer movie for this
year. The talented Smith and Jones boys solidify their box office
appeal, and Sonnenfeld answers the question `Who you gonna call?' for
offbeat stories that need a sympathetic director. Creature-meister Rick
Baker and Industrial Lights and Magic did their usual superlative job.
Betcha can't see it just once.

Author
Michael Dequina
Men in Black (PG-13) *** 1/2 (out of ****)
UFOs.  Aliens.  Slime.  Will Smith.  What more can you ask for?  In
the case of last year's Independence Day, a self-awareness of its inherent
ridiculousness would have helped.  That problem does not befall Smith's
latest bout with creatures from outer space, Barry Sonnenfeld's witty and
fun sci-fi-action-comedy Men in Black.
In this adaptation of Lowell Cunningham's obscure Marvel/Malibu
comic, Smith stars as a New York cop who is recruited by mysterious Agent K
(Tommy Lee Jones) into the ultrasecret underground group known as the Men in
Black, which overlook intergalactic relations.  It is up to Agent K and the
newly christened Agent J to prevent an alien bug disguised as a farmer
(Vincent D'Onofrio) from stealing a galaxy and thereby causing an
interplanetary war and, in turn, the destruction of earth.
If this sounds a tad confusing to you, you're not alone.  MiB's
biggest problem is its story--the primary plot cooked up by screenwriter Ed
Solomon is introduced fairly late in the game and never completely adds up
(just what is the deal with the bag of marbles at the end?).  But by the
time the nominal plot takes center stage, the film has already won you over
with the script's witty one-liners, self-effacing sense of humor, and bashes
at pop culture (Sylvester Stallone is skewered in one of the more inspired
gags); and its imaginative production design (by Bo Welch) and visual
effects (supervised by Eric Brevig).  Most impressive, however, are the
alien makeup effects designed by Rick Baker.  The creatures look like
exactly that--living, breathing alien creatures and not animatronic puppets.
Especially convincing is an alien infant whom J delivers; slinky, squidlike,
and covered in slime, the expressive baby alien succeeds in doing what the
best human infants do onscreen--look cute and elicit "aw"s.
As impressive a technical achievement MiB is, it would not have
worked without a strong lead duo, and Jones and Smith make a great team.
Smith's natural, infectious ebullience plays off well against the stoic
Jones, who is at his deadpan best, engaging in some ridiculous situations
with the straightest of faces.  It is one thing to wear a straight face
while having a heated discussion with an uncooperative dog, but it's quite a
whole other level of achievement to do that and convincingly appear to treat
the situation with the gravest of seriousness.  Jones's K never shakes off
his grim face even when he is joking, making his performance that much more
effective and funny.  D'Onofrio has some great slapstick moments as the
insect who hasn't quite got the hang of wearing a human skin suit, and
though she's underused, Linda Fiorentino, as coroner Dr. Laurel Weaver, fits
quite snugly with the team of Jones and Smith.
Men in Black is certain not to reach the stratospheric box office
heights of Smith's bountiful bout with aliens last summer, but in shedding
the self-importance and jingoism of the two-hour-plus ID4 and taking on a
most welcome self-aware sense of humor, the lean, mean, 98-minute MiB is not
just a better film, it's also a lot more fun.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Veteran actor Tommy Lee Jones and rising film star Will Smith are now the 
coolest guys on the planet.  The best, last and only line of defense against 
the worst scum of the universe.  They work in secret and they dress in black.
They see things that we need not see, they be places that we need not be, so go 
what you like look at the Roswell crap, show up with the black suit because 
that's the men in, that the men in, that's the Men in Black (Movie Zone 
recommends purchasing the MIB soundtrack from your local music retailer).  
Ok, so the films got catchy music and special effects, an appealing plot and 
some fine Hollywood actors, so what else does it need to be a success?  Well 
nothing really, since the film has earned nearly 240 million dollars in the USA 
alone and is number 14 on the American all time highest grossing list.  But 
what could have been a really great movie was only a reasonably good movie.  
Confused?  Read on.
Working for a highly funded yet unofficial government agency is K (Tommy Lee 
Jones) and newly recruited J (Will Smith), who investigate and patrol 
extraterrestrial life on earth.  In no time they discover some wandering aliens 
(disguised as humans), and an intergalactic terrorist on a mission to 
assassinate the High Prince of Baltia (a high figure in the universe).  When 
the prince is killed and his most treasured possession falls into the wrong 
hands, one group of aliens take personal offense and threaten to destroy Earth 
if his "jewel" is not recovered.  So K and J find themselves find themselves 
racing against time to find the alien terrorist and recover his precious 
commodity in one intergalactic week (one hour).  Still dressed in black and 
ready for action, the coolest partners this side of the universe have the fate 
of Earth in their hands.
If there's one thing MIB does extremely well, it's the fun factor.  The various 
scenes that make up the film are clever, funny and go straight to the point so 
the audience is never losing interest or becoming bored.  Will Smith is a great 
credit to the movie, and supplies many hilarious one lines that fans will 
appreciate.  Perhaps the most dazzling part of MIB are its unmistakable special 
effects which launch creativity and imagination, and from small worm guys and a 
gruesome huge insect the aliens look like nothing ever done before.  It is 
however, a little too short - one hour and ten minutes really doesn't satisfy 
those waiting months to see it (MIB was probably the most hyped movie since 
Independence Day, which mysteriously also starred Will Smith).  Although the 
entire movie is of a high quality and is presented in a comic style way, MIB 
misses out on being the best of its kind, and what could have been something 
truly special just missed the mark.


Author
Steve Kong
In a recent interview when asked what he did in Men in Black, Tommy Lee
Jones gave a simple answer, "You can't be too cool in this movie." Isn't
that the truth Mr. Jones. And cool he is along with Mr. Smith.
I don't remember laughing so hard and much during any recent movie that
I've seen. Men In Black is an all out sci-fi comedy from Barry Sonnenfeld
(Get Shorty, The Addams Family). There is a story that carries on in Men In
Black, but it's pretty thin. And that's a good thing. For a movie like MIB
there's nothing more annoying than a heavy plot to weight down the movie.
MIB takes from comic roots, and the story seems to be on that line too,
simple and to the point, nothing that gets in the way of the comedy and
special effects. 
Tommy Lee Jones plays Agent K, who works for the super secret MIB group.
They answer to no one, because government asks too many questions.
Patenting alien technology and selling it here on Earth creates the funds
needed to run the MIB group. The MIB serves as the INS (Immigration and
Naturalization Service) of the universe. They get aliens on Earth, and keep
track of them. Will Smith plays a NYPD cop who is recruited by Agent K to
work for the MIB and he soon becomes Agent J. Smith, who did some alien
hunting in Independence Day, gets more to do in this film. And it is a
well-deserved part for Smith. Together K and J must find a "bug" who has
crash landed here on Earth and is trying to steal a universe in Orion's
Belt. Well, there's the story. Pretty simple, but enough to keep the
audience at bay for just under two hours.
The bug that has crash-landed here on Earth takes over the body of a
farmer, Edgar, played very well by Vincent D'Onofrio. The alien has a hard
time inhabitting Edgar's body, and this is one of the comedy bits that runs
through the movie. Seeing the alien walk around in Edgar's body,
uncomfortable and crowded. The comedy in the movie comes in all forms, some
from J encountering new aliens to aliens who take the bodies of bulldogs.
Tommy Lee Jones, who admits in interviews that he is not a comedic actor,
pulls a great performance out of the hat. His seriousness on the screen
equates to some of the funniest scenes. Will Smith who is a natural comic
does well (again) as an alien-hunter.
The overall production value is noticeable. The aliens are incredibly
detailed, I especially liked the Ambassador alien who lives in a man's
head. This alien is so life like in the movie that it was a
how-did-they-do-that moment. The break-room aliens were also hilarious.
But, these are just a few of the many aliens that inhabit the world of MIB.
And unlike some sci-fi movies where all the aliens are humanoid and speak
English, MIB is populated by aliens who are of all shapes and sizes and
speak their own native languages. The set designs, alien designs, and
costume designs are all well done. From the simple black suits that MIB
agents wear to aliens whose heads regenerate after being shot, the movie
just drips with big, well done production values.
In the worth mentioning section, I have to mention two things. First is the
film score by Danny Elfman. Yet another great movie score by Elfman
(Batman, Mission:Impossible, Nightmare Before Christmas). The music fits so
well with the film that it is hardly noticeable at times. The second thing
that is worth mentioning is the opening sequence that follows a mosquito in
flight for five minutes, during the credits, before an untimely death.
Men In Black is one of those heavily hyped films that doesn't disappoint.
It has a well-balanced blend of laugh-out-loud comedy and
eye-opening-special effects that will appeal to everyone. Go see Men In
Black, you won't be sorry.

Author
George McAdams
In life's greater scheme, movies sometime take on a life of their own,
often overshadowing their actual value to society, which seems especially
true for summer blockbusters and action movies. With MEN IN BLACK, also
known to those in the know as MIB, the hype-machine practically guaranteed
that the movie would fall short. And clocking in at barely over one hour
and thirty minutes, it's shorter in more ways than one.
As a buddy movie it lacks buddy-ism. It tries to have the Tommy Lee Jones,
as K, and Will Smith, as J, banter about in manners reminiscent of the Mel
Gibson and Danny Glover in the "Lethal Weapon" movies, but it doesn't have
any "heart" between the two. If anything, MIB is more of an update of
"Dragnet" (1987) if it had been produced and directed by the Cohen
brothers, with a couple of slimy aliens thrown in. Additionally, there's a
moment where we see Jones zero-in, via satellite, a woman working in her
garden, but this "touching" twenty seconds is more like the movie hitting a
speed bump, rather than a detour down a lane to a heartfelt moment.
On the plus side, the movie does have a great premise: that aliens live on
Earth, disguised as humans and other animals, and that Earth is sort of a
neutral zone. "Sort of Casablanca, without the Nazi's," as K explains to J,
which when you think about it explains the behavior of certain basketball
coaches, boxers, and that cousin of yours that doesn't really resemble
anyone in your family's tree.
The concept reminds me of an early comic routine used by David Letterman,
in which Letterman reasoned that the appearance of aliens on earth is that
earth is sort of a "Stuckey's" way stop for the galaxy. And while none of
Letterman's jokes were used in MIB, the sharply written dialogue was
another of the redeeming qualities of MIB.
While MIB offers a good solid performance by Tommy Lee Jones, a smooth
performance by Will Smith, good action sequences, and imaginative set
designs, it does not live-up to the hype this movie has promised, and we
the viewer has had to endure during the past several months. Had it taken
the potential that was there to have more human emotions present, I feel it
would have been a better movie. 
On a scale of one to four, I give this movie a two. I enjoyed it, and would
recommend it to those who want to see a mindless action movie that has some
snappy dialogue. However, don't expect to see me standing in line again.
The web site for MIB is http://www.meninblack.com.  It looks great, but
lacks some of the pizzazz of some of the other movie sites have.  

Author
Michael J. Legeros
A movie review by Michael J. Legeros
Copyright 1997 by Michael J. Legeros
     The de facto best of the June and early-July action comedies, MEN
IN BLACK has everything that you could want in yet another $100M adap-
tation of a comic-book:  a wise-cracking lead (Will Smith), his crusty
partner (Tommy Lee Jones, all deadpan), a bugged-out villain (Vincent
D'Onofrio, with a hefty assist from make-up artist Rick Baker), a pop-
reference friendly premise (GHOSTBUSTERS meets "The X-Files" meets
"Dragnet" meets THE BLUES BROTHERS), cool sets and cooler gadgets (prod-
uction design by Bo Welch), good music (by Danny Elfman), great loca-
tions (in and around New York City), and a director (Barry Sonnenfield,
of GET SHORTY and ADDAMS FAMILY fame) who happens to have the most
macabre sense of humor this side of Tim Burton.  And all of it rendered
in such a disarmingly unpretentious and almost... throwaway fashion,
that you can't *help* but like it.  By the second hour, however, the
seams begin to show.  There's not nearly enough plot or character de-
velopment to offset the sight gags or special effects, both of which are
*also* in short supply.  MEN IN BLACK holds back on everything and the
result is a cycle as vicious as Mike Tyson's appetite for flesh.  There
isn't enough story to keep the characters interesting when the gags go
flat, nor are there enough gags to keep the characters interesting when
the *story* goes flat.  Maybe the sequel will be a bit better.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     "You can have my gun when you pry it from my cold dead fingers,"
boldly proclaims a shotgun-carrying redneck named Edgar (Vincent
D'Onofrio) to the alien who had the audacity to trash his pickup truck
by landing a flying saucer in his yard.  "Your proposal is accepted,"
replies the alien just before he fries poor Edgar's tiny brain.
     Yes, it's the hit of the summer, MEN IN BLACK, which is everything
that last year's MARS ATTACKS! should have been, but wasn't.
     The legal vs. illegal alien controversy from today's news
headlines continues in this dead serious comedy about a different class
of aliens, those from outer space.  In some careful casting, Tommy Lee
Jones is marvelous as seasoned agent K of Division 6.  Don't be
surprised if you haven't heard of Division 6 of the Immigration and
Naturalization Services, neither have any of the "normal" agents of the
INS in this film.
     The following may come as a shock to you, it did to James Edwards,
so you may want to sit down.  There are over 1,500 aliens living on
earth.  Now, not to worry, since most of them are "hard working types
trying to make a living."  But then there are those few renegades and
misfits.  Division 6 was set up to keep all the aliens under control
and keep knowledge of their existence away from you and me, lest we
become frightened.  (Personally, I would not be scared if I knew that
creatures looking like members of the STAR WARS cantina, but more
gooey, were infesting our planet.  But you might panic.)
     Rich Baker's work designing the aliens certainly deserves Oscar
consideration for his mixture of silliness and function -- sort of a
retro science fiction look for the 90s.  Mary E. Vogt's costumes for
the agents, think 60s James Bond suave with tapered suits, thin ties,
and plain Ray Ban sunglasses -- all in black, provide the perfect
complement to the aliens' kookiness.
     James Edwards is an NYPD cop until K recruits him into the program
as agent J.  Will Smith, who was one of the best things about last
summer's smash hit INDEPENDENCE DAY, plays J with a sweet naivete.
When J is given a pip-squeak of a gun, he complains that he wants a big
one like K's.  In one of my son's favorite scenes, J's first use of the
weapon knocks him back ten yards and blows an enormous hole across from
him.
     Ed Solomon's script has a stream of gags, most of which work,
thanks to Barry Sonnenfeld's direction.  J is shown a wall of
television screens which are used to monitor such aliens as Sylvester
Stallone, Steven Spielberg, Newt Gingrich, and others.  It even has J's
third grade teacher, whom he always suspected was from Venus (although
it turned out to be Jupiter).
     The story, which is based on a Lowell Cunningham comic book,
teaches us valuable lessons.  Perhaps the most instructive is that we
learn that Division 6 uses the hot sheets, you know them as the
tabloids, as research material.  All of those alien sightings blazed
across their headlines are actually true!
     The sincerity with which the actors approach their material makes
the movie.  While posing as an FBI agent, K explains in no uncertain
terms that, "We here at the FBI, do not have a sense of humor we are
aware of."
     MEN IN BLACK is one of the few films that would be better if it
were longer.  Editor Jim Miller has simply chopped too much.  The
resulting movie feels like they were scared that we would grow tired if
shown too much of it, so they trimmed out every non-essential scene.
The result is a story that jerks along as if key scenes are missing.
     Linda Fiorentino, who gave a brilliant and rock hard performance
in THE LAST SEDUCTION, plays the underwritten role of the medical
examiner, Dr. Laurel Weaver.  (But as everyone is probably now aware,
we are likely to see a lot more of her as agent L in MEN IN BLACK 2.)
Fiorentino is bursting with talent but has been unable, until now
perhaps, to land a high profile part.  She has the abilities to be a
star, but stardom has managed to elude her thus far.  I hope some
producer, with the right, big part, discovers her and takes a risk on
her in a starring role.
     Oh yes, along the way there is the outline of a plot.  ("Deliver
the galaxy or the earth will be destroyed," warns a battleship from
space so war must be eminent.)  Still, you are likely to have trouble
following the plot even if you take good notes.  On the other hand, who
cares?  Much better to sit back and enjoy such morsels as Edgar's.
After being transformed into an alien, he looks at the luscious Dr.
Weaver.  "You're coming with me," he informs her.  "It's a long trip.
I'll need a snack."
     MEN IN BLACK runs 1:38.  It is rated PG-13 for some mild
profanities and sci-fi violence.  The film should be fine for most kids
around 8 and up.  My son Jeffrey, age 8, got pretty scared and even
talked about leaving at times, but ended up liking the show.  His
favorite monsters were the one in the beginning whom K orders, "put up
your arms and all your flippers," and the big cockroach at the end.  I
thought the show was funny and imaginative so I am recommending it and
giving it ***.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
This year's "Independence Day", hyped to all hell and back
release: the Men in Black are shadowy agents who monitor alien
activity on Earth, suppressing evidence that would alert the
general public.  The laconic Kay (Jones) initiates a new agent
(Smith) while they chase a rouge alien, all three being in
pursuit of a plot macguffin.
Reviewing the latest Big Movie Event is a fraught task.  After
a deluge of publicity (so omnipresent that even hitherto
undiscovered tribes in the highlands of Myanmar can comment
fluently on Will Smith's witticisms), anyone with even the
slightest amount of cynicism would feel disappointment with the
actual product.  "Men in Black" doesn't measure up to its
pre-publicity, what movie could?  Like fashion, the movie
business has become disconnected with its end product and in now
largely about marketing the peripherals: the paraphernalia, the
licensing, the toys, the image.  More's the pity, because there
is actually a quirky and very sly picture hiding under the
curtain of hype.
The first clue that this is not the ultra-slick blockbuster
that is being marketed, is the spidery lettering of the opening
credit sequence.  A camera dizzily follows a mosquito bumbling
through a landscape of distorted, towering figures.  Director
Sonnenfeld is shooting from a point of view somewhere near Tim
"Edward Scissorhands" Burton, seeing a world turned at 90 degrees
to reality. (A comparison that is heightened by the Danny
Elfman score.)  In this way "Men in Black" is also reminiscent of
Sonnenfeld's previous "Addams Family" or "Get Shorty", in that we
see this weird world - blandly accepted by its inhabitants - and
its collision with the "real" world.
As Agent Kay, Tommy Lee Jones is thus this film's Gomez
Addams, completely unquestioning of his worldview.  Jones is
wonderfully hangdog, deadpanning throwaway lines as he shrugs off
body stealing, alien invasion and world destruction.  ("We're
self-funding through holding the patents on several bits of alien
technology we've acquired: microwave ovens, velcro,
liposuction.")  Will Smith, seemingly getting his acting
inspiration from "Shaft", is less interesting but at least does
not damage the picture.  Linda Fiorentino, as a curious medical
examiner, has some fun and is not wasted here as she was in
"Unforgettable".  Rip Torn contributes a minor but effective part
as the leader of the Men in Black.
Entertainment-wise, the first half of the film is rich on
laughs although of the surreal, dry type: Kay wrestles with a
foot-high alien as onlookers stare.  A group of agency initiates
struggle with a test while trapped in a room full of
dysfunctional 60s furniture.  There are no punchlines are per se,
it is the scenes that are funny.  Regrettably this attitude takes
a backseat as a conventional "find the magic widget" plot takes
over at about the halfway point.  This and some discrepancies
between the trailer and the film make me suspect that there was
some interference in the production.  Fortunately, "Men in Black"
does not outstay its welcome, tipping the scales at just over 1
and a half hours.
Not the blockbuster the studio might have wanted (and
perhaps that's best), "Men in Black" is cute, quirky and
recommended.  Knock down the rating some if you're become sick of
all the marketing.  [***/interesting] and Steve Reich on the TV
on the Sid and Nancy scale.
------
paul-michael agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."
[archived at http://www.cs.latrobe.edu.au/~agapow/Postviews/]

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
A lot of times a three-star film will be my favorite. They're usually the
kind of movie I can watch most often too. They're usually not too deep,
allowing for semi-brainless relaxation, and at the same time, not too dumb.
MEN IN BLACK is a four-star three-star film. (Hope you could follow that one)
MEN IN BLACK doesn't wait to get to the fun. Just minutes into the film we
are introduced to Agent Kay (Tommy Lee Jones), introduced to an alien, and
introduced to the the awesome memory-diminishing tool that all MiB agents
use. After all, you can't have alien witnesses running around with that kind
of knowledge can you?
MEN IN BLACK is, of course, the organization which "moniters all
extra-terrestrial activity on Earth". NYPD officer James Edwards (Will
Smith), is on a routine foot chase when suddenly the no-good punk he's
chasing starts leaping up buildings and blinking more than one pair of eyes.
The alien delivers the simple message that the world is going to end, and
with that, dives off of a roof. Naturally nobody believes his story . . .
nobody that is, except for the top secret organization that not even the
government is aware of. 
Edwards then meets Agent Kay, the man who never seems to crack a smile, and
is introduced to the MiB. Edwards winds up joining the team and is stripped
of anything that can point back to him (birth certificate, drivers license,
and even the literal removal of his fingerprints). James Edwards no longer
exists. Meet Agent Jay.
Agent Kay takes the rookie Jay under his wing as they go about "regular"
duties. Eventually a far more treacherous event comes into play. A "bug" has
landed on Earth and is going to wipe out mankind if these two don't (or
can't) stop it. The plot isn't exactly clear, but we know it has to do with a
galaxy as big as a jewel or marble being sought after on Earth, and that is
crucial that the MiB find it before the "bug" does.
Barry Sonnenfeld, who also did the ADDAMS FAMILY films, directs this nicely.
It's fun, it's funny, it's action-packed. A nice summer blockbuster as it
rightfully turned out to be. This is one of those movies that is just "fun"
and can't really be summed up any nicer or clearer. Will Smith and Tommy Lee
Jones both do great jobs and both are a blast to watch. Definitely one of the
best films of the the summer of '97, MEN IN BLACK comes highly recommeded
from me!

Author
Nick Schaden
        "Men In Black" had everything going for it: hype, some favorable
reviews, even plenty of original and good movie elements as I watched
it.   Unfortuately, while "Men In Black" is better than average,
considering the real potential of this movie, it was a disapointment.
        "Men In Black" tells the story of Agent K (Tommy Lee Jones) and newly
recruited ex-cop Agent J (Will Smith) attempt to save the earth from
aliens, in an elite covert private organization.   All members wear
black suits, ties, watches,
etc. hence the name of the movie, "Men In Black".   The movie's plot is
as simple as other summer blockbusters, yet far supasses them by having
a completely original screenplay.
        Plot is just one of the strengths of "Men In Black".   In addition, the
acting is well done by both Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith.  The movie
is moderately funny and witty, with "aliens" not neccesarly being those
huge evil things we're use to seing from the likes of Ridley Scott's
"Aliens".   Instead the extra terrestials have a human form/disguise
while down on Earth, allowing for plenty of wise cracks about Dennis
Rodman, Sylvester Stallone and Newt Gingrich all as "aliens".
        Unfortunately, these smart ideas fall quickly to several major problems
with the movie.   For example, the really funny humor for me only lasted
until Will Smith is inducted into the MIB orgainzation (relatively early
in the movie), much of the wit and ingenous of the movie seems to fall
into place during that period.   From there unfortunately, the humor
went downhill, which was incredibly frustrating considering how well
"Men In Black" started out as.   In addition, for all the money spent on
that picture the special effects didn't jump out at me as much as I had
hoped for or expected.   Furthermore, the movie's too short, 90 minutes
wasn't enough time to develop a sound or more complex plot.   Finally,
it should be noted that Linda Fiorentino's character (Dr. Laurel Weaver)
suprisingly large supporting role is relatively 
pointless: She isn't integral at all to the main plot (rather
distracting from it), and her character seems to be doing little rather
than flouting her legs to the male audience.
        In sum, "Men In Black" starts with a bang: fresh plot, good acting,
funny script, everything you could ask for.   However, part way through,
the picture loses steam and grinds to a halt somewhere marginally above
average.  This is sad considering
with some tweaking and reworking "Men In Black" could have been one of
the wittiest and funniest movies of the year.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Steven Spielberg's Amblin Entertainment has turned a dubious
premise into a delightful science fiction comedy.  Taking much the same
premise as TV's DARK SKIES, but handling it very differently, MEN IN
BLACK tells the story of special, super-secret government agents
charged with the responsibility for keeping the secret that at any
given time there are about 1500 space aliens running around on Earth,
natives of hundreds of different inhabited worlds.  Most are friendly,
but of course wherever there are lots of aliens there will always be a
few rotten apples who want to vaporize the planet Earth for the greater
glory of someone with a name like Zordalg.  New York cop James Edwards
(played by Will Smith) knows nothing of this, of course.  He just knows
that something is strange when he runs down a felon with funny eyes.
This feat earns him a candidacy for some unspecified government job
that turns out to be joining the Men in Black.  Once chosen he is re-
dubbed Agent J working with the experienced and cagey Agent K (Tommy
Lee Jones).
     Ed Solomon's script, based on the comic book by Lowell Cunningham,
is a barrage of funny lines and scenes of just how strange things can
be dealing with aliens.  But all that is about the background for the
real plot.  The actual story gets very little screentime comparatively.
The film is short as it is at 98 minutes and most of that time is taken
up with the background.  The actual story deals with two alien races
fighting over the fate of a galaxy.  One race is represented by an old
Jewish man controlled by good-guy aliens.  The other is an evil giant
bug who possesses the body of the redneck Edgar.  Vincent D'Onofrio
plays the possessed Edgar, but like most people would be the first time
behind the wheel of an 18-wheel truck, the creature just cannot get the
hang of the controls.  D'Onofrio is usually a serious actor, as he was
in THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD, but here he shows a real genius for physical
comedy.  He manages to walk his human body around, but not one body
part moves naturally.  Because so much of the film is taken up with
introduction to the premise this feels like the first film of series or
perhaps a pilot for a film series.  And if public enthusiasm remains
high, sequels of some form seem inevitable.  Director Barry Sonnenfeld
is best known for directing the two Addams Family films and GET SHORTY.
His Addams Family series was cut short by the death of Raoul Julia, but
he now has another chance in much the same vein with MEN IN BLACK.
     A manic film deserves a manic musical score, and manic scores are
a specialty of Danny Elfman.  It combines with good special effects and
Rick Baker makeup and effects.  In sum, MEN IN BLACK may well be one of
the best films of this summer's fly-weight class.  I give it a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Marty Mapes
The movie is light and airy fun. It never drags and it's always
entertaining, so after a mere 96 minutes we're sorry to have to leave
the theater. 
In case you haven't heard, K (Tommy Lee Jones) works for a secret
government agency, Men in Black (MiB, sort of like the interstellar
version of the INS). K recruits young J (Will Smith) to help him track
and control alien life forms living on planet Earth. 
Soon after J joins up, MiB learns of a threat from a race of aliens who
threaten to blow up Earth if a certain galaxy (don't ask) is not
returned. Or something like that. As NEWSWEEK says, the plot doesn't
really matter in this movie. What does matter are outstanding comedy
performances, wonderfully cartoonish sets, and a smart, witty script. 
Tommy Lee Jones is the perfect straight man. His K has been favorably
compared to Jack Webb's humorless lawman Joe Friday. Everything in the
movie is absurd, but K takes it all in stride. And Will Smith plays off
of Jones with an overeager confidence that tests the limits of Jones'
deadpan. 
Production designer Bo Welch has done some excellent work for Tim Burton
in the past. He designed EDWARD SCISSORHANDS, BEETLEJUICE, and BATMAN
RETURNS. That same bold cartoonish look is put to wonderful use in MEN
IN BLACK. The MiB testing room is designed for the 60's futuristic look
and not the functionality. The main foyer of the MiB offices is a giant
empty granite cube, its solitary features an industrial-sized blower and
return vent (the lone guard has dragged in a cheap office chair so he
can sit and work his crossword). Once inside, the offices of MiB
headquarters look like the exterior of Boulder's own mushroom house seen
in Woody Allen's SLEEPER. 
The script keeps the jokes coming at a nice brisk pace. In fact, you may
have to see the movie twice to catch all the jokes in the background and
the jokes you missed because the audience was laughing. Continuing the
tradition, I will NOT reveal any jokes in this review; suffice it to say
that you should pay close attention lest you miss something funny. 
Some of the fun in MiB comes from identifying its little winks at other
science fiction movies. I Found references to DR. STRANGELOVE, WAR OF
THE WORLDS, GHOSTBUSTERS, STAR TREK: GENERATIONS, and THE ADVENTURES OF
BUCKAROO BANZAI, to name a few. That's one more thing to keep your eyes
open for. 
Though you will be rewarded if you watch closely, the movie does not
require much effort. It is a light and refreshing diversion, a perfect
way to spend a few hours of your summer. 
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Jerry Saravia
Do we really need more movies about aliens? Since the success of the mediocre
"Independence Day," the multiplex has been full of them. Television has "The
famous black-and-white footage of a supposed alien autopsy. We have also had
the marvelously witty and wicked satire "Mars Attacks!" but seriously folks,
the thrill is gone. "Men in Black" is an entertainingly engaging comedy, and is
full of whiz-bang effects galore, but it doesn't come close to the level of
"Mars Attacks!"
During the opening sequence, we see Will Smith as a cop chasing a remarkably
fast and superhuman killer who leaps from a high-rise building and disappears.
It turns out the killer is an alien, and the Man in Black (Tommy Lee Jones)
arrives on the scene and blasts Will's face with some kind of flashlight stick
called a "neuralizer." Pretty soon, Smith hesitantly joins Jones in a secret
organization called M.I.B., led by a big boss played by Rip Torn who "works 27
hours a day." Their job is to monitor the 1,500 extraterrestrials who disguise
themselves as humans and are mostly residing in Manhattan. Any human memory of
aliens is zapped by the M.I.B's neuralizers. The aliens themselves are not
really evil or monstrous, they are really annoying! One of them even disguises
himself as a dog. 
One evil visitor lands in a farmer's backyard. The bug-like alien kills the
farmer and assumes human form as played by Vincent D'Onofrio - he becomes a
decomposing zombie with an obvious limp. This becomes a sly, amusing joke and
it as wacky and overdone as you can imagine. Still, director Barry Sonnenfeld
("Get Shorty") has a commonplace flaw - he tends to take the spontaneity out of
all the numerous gags and jokes by presenting them one after another and
compressing them, and then giving us some dead space until the truly funny
climax. This become more overbearing than exhilarating, and you might forget
most of the jokes since they slip by so quickly. "Men in Black" runs by at a
full-throttle speed of 98 minutes, but it never truly takes off.
The performances hit all the right notes. Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith have
great comic chemistry and seem to be having a great time. D'Onofrio is a real
riot to watch, although Linda Fiorentino is underutilized, as most female leads
are nowadays, as a doctor who is constantly neuralized. The biggest scene
stealer is an alien disguised as a dog ("You can kiss my furry little butt.")
that provides the biggest laugh in the entire movie. 
The visual effects are impressive, especially the final shot of an alien
holding the entire universe on the palm of his hand, and Sonnenfeld has a quick
directorial eye (his visual inventiveness since "The Addams Family," though,
has diminished). The movie is definitely fun yet somewhat dispiriting, and is
not half as clever as the original "Ghostbusters." Another flaw is that it
starts and stops frequently after a bright, rhythmic half-hour - a problem that
conflicts most box-office bonanzas. It's decent fun but, frankly, I've had it
with aliens and would prefer more dinosaurs any day.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Author
Michael Redman
This irrelevant romp through a battle with goofy aliens is everything that
"Mars Attacks" promised last summer and failed to deliver: it's comical and
almost has a plot.
Back about the time of the Roswell landing -- or crash dummies in a weather
balloon, depending on which outlandish tale you chose to believe -- the "scum
of the universe" began moving to earth. Now there are 1500 disguised as humans
living mostly in New York City, although anyone who has spent time in the Big
Apple might have estimated a higher number. Think of it as "Casablanca without
the Nazis" as Special Agent K explains.
As with everything else in our brave new world, these offworlders need to be
kept track of and the public protected from itself. That task falls to the Men
In Black, members of an agency so secret that even the government doesn't know
about it. Agents K and J (Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith) are at the forefront
of immigration control. ("Jones" and "Smith": now those are names that aliens
might take.)
Disguised as humans (notably Newt Gingrich, Dennis Rodman and Sylvester
Stallone) they mostly live normal lives until a viscous insectoid illegal
alien arrives on an assassination mission. Mission completed, the bug goes on
a killing spree while the planet is in danger of destruction.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld ("Addams Family", "Get Shorty") has taken a little
known Malibu comic book and turned out a witty film filled with subtle jests
as well as the expected slapstick and outer space goo. The almost-overlooked
material is as comical as the longer more obvious scenes. J's delivery of the
tenacled baby and  K's shakedown of a reluctant dog are hilarious. So is the
notion that the supermarket tabloids are the only ones to print the truth and
the throwaway "Elvis isn't dead, he's gone home" line.
Jones' deadpan delivery is perfect for the blasé agent who's seen too much and
is training his new partner in the ways of the unexpected. (After shooting off
the head of a pawnshop owner who promptly grows it back and reveals a cache of
high-tech weapons hidden behind the jewelry, K asks his associate "Did you
notice anything strange?")
Smith, in his return to the science fiction battles after "Independence Day",
is the tall handsome leading man for the end of the century. If Eddie Murphy
were still making quality movies, he might have had this role. Since Murphy's
career fell apart a few years back due to some bad choices, Smith fills his
wise-cracking over the edge shoes admirably.
The supporting roles are filled with competent actors (Rip Torn, Linda
Fiorentino) but don't get much screen time. The exception is Vincent D'Onofrio
who plays the giant cockroach in ill-fitting redneck skin suit. As his face
constantly slips around and scrunches up in the corners, the bug doesn't quite
have the "walking around in human skin" gig down and steals every scene that
he's in.
There are a few problems. The buddy bit of this buddy film doesn't come
across, the film seems a bit short and some portions underdeveloped. But it's
an energetic comedy and the effects are impressive without burying the humans.
It's one of the few films of the genre that you won't regret seeing.
(Michael Redman as penned these words of wisdom for over 21 years and would
like to congratulate Chet Chmielewski and Jennifer St. Dennis on the birth of
their daughter Kathryn Claire who has nary a tentacle in sight. Electronic
missives shoot directly to mredman@bvoice.com )
[This appeared in the 7/10/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana]
-- 
mailto:mredman@bvoice.com

Author
Ben Hoffman
OUT OF THIS WORLD!  EXTRATERRESTRIAL AND EXTRA-HILARIOUS!   The Sci-Fi
genre has never been this funny.  With some witty lines written by
screen story and screenplay writer Ed Solomon, free rein is given to
Tommy Lee Jones in his role of K, the man in black who works for the
unofficial government agency that monitors aliens on Earth.  There
credo is "Protecting the Earth from the scum of the universe." K spouts
some very funny lines despite his tongue never leaving his cheek.
Jones is terrific.  Look for lots of belly-laughs.  Why are these
agents called "MEN IN BLACK?" Because they dress in black, why else?
When  Zed (Rip Torn), the chief of the agency, learns that inhabitants
of another planet are planning on conquering Earth, he assigns J (Will
Smith) to help K save us. It is good to see Smith again on the large
screen after that fine performance in SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION of a
few years ago. Casting could not have chosen a better actor for the
role of J.
The evil extraterrestrial, Edgar, (Vincent D'Onofrio) visits a
farmhouse, takes over the farmer's body and for the rest of the movie
grimaces and walks around like a Dr. Frankenstein's monster reject . .
. except that Edgar is a takeoff on monsters and a funny takeoff it
is.
When some strange deaths occur, the bodies are turned over to a medical
examiner, Dr. Laura Weaver (the pretty Linda Fiorentino) who becomes
involved with the monsters and with trying to save the planet.
Special effects include the gelatinous slime that the aliens squirt at
the Earthlings.   There is an alien, Mikey, whose exterior is that of a
Mexican immigrant but he cannot fool our hero, K, who rips off his
false face to expose his hideous, slimy real self while immigration
border patrol police are shocked.  Then there is the High Priest of
Baltia who likewise uses a human disguise.
The visual special effects were supervised by Eric Brevig; (Industrial
Light & Magic) the alien make-up by Rick Baker.   These are all
excellent.   The film is based on the Malibu Comic by Lowell
Cunningham.

Author
Mike Borzumate

For details of my reviewing style, please see the note at the end of
the review.
    FINALLY.  That was my reaction 1/3 of the way into MIB.  Finally a
movie this summer that I could enjoy!
    This movie is everything _Batman & Robin_ failed to be.  It held my
attention start to finish, and I enjoyed every minute of it.
    Everyone in the movie gave excellent performances.  Mr. Jones and Mr.
Smith were outstanding.  Jones's dead-pan humor and seriousness clicked
wonderfully.  Smith's quick wit and slick style were a perfect fit.
    But, surprisingly, the most impressive performance for me was Vincent
D'Onofrio as the major evil character.  His performance was so unstressed
and dynamic that it was completely believable.  Furthermore, it looked
like he threw himself wholeheartedly into the part.  He should win an
Oscar.
    The effects were special, but not overbearing.  Their subtlety
helped to leave me feeling like the movie _just might_ be true.
   My only criticisms are that the film seems to end much too soon and
hurriedly, and Linda Fiorentino's part is far too minor.  Not only is she
gorgeous (even moreso now that we have seen her as a coroner), but she is
also a very talented actress.  It is too bad this movie didn't offer her
much of an opportunity to show that off.
    You want to see this movie at least once at a theatre.  I'd recommend
you see it at least three times.  I wouldn't recommend it for the littlest
members of the family, but bring everyone else.  Make an event of it.  Do
not miss this movie.

I give two ratings: An arbitrary scale of enjoyability (1 to 10) and
a maximum price I would pay to see the movie.

Author
Craig Good
Finally: A big, effects-laden summer movie that is actually worth the
time and the $7.50 to go see. "Men In Black" takes precise aim at its
target and scores a bullseye. It almost unfailingly hits the right tone
and the right character moments throughout. Vincent D'Onofrio should
get an Oscar nomination. Tommy Lee Jones plays it straight. Will Smith
isn't annoying. About the only cast member not used to her potential is
Linda Fiorentino. A quibble.
While certainly no "Chinatown", the script (yes, there actually was
one) shows clear evidence of thought on the part of the writers. In
case the writers or producers of the summer's other megaduds are
reading, I'll repeat those strange words slowly so they can sound them
out: "S-c-r-i-p-t". "T-h-o-u-g-h-t."
Refreshingly free of forced one-liners, we are instead treated to
exchanges with some actual wit.
The production design by Bo Welch ("Batman Returns", "Edward
Scissorhands", "Wolf") is deliciously good. The cinematography by
Donald Peterman ("Get Shorty", "Point Break", "Flashdance") under Barry
Sonnenfeld's direction is both clear and energetic.
A great part of the fun is that the movie manages to both skewer
blockbuster summer movies and be a blockbuster summer movie. My dad
taught me as a kid that the best riders at the rodeo were always the
clowns. You have to be good at something to poke fun of it.
"Men In Black" is a welcome relief for those who thought they'd have to
wait for Oscar season before having fun at the movies.

Author
James McGowan
I had the pleasure of seing Men In Black last night at a press 
screening.  First, if there's justice in this world, MIB should blow 
every summer release out of the water (not a thinly veiled reference 
to that execrable waste of celluloid, Speed 2, or to the upcoming 
Titanic).  Second, it's great to see some imagination to go along with 
great special effects for a change!
The story line is cute, and does a great job of twisting popular 
perspectives on such things as the tabloid press and government 
conspiracies.  Jones is his usual gruff, lovable self as a seasoned 
"man in black".  Smith is terrific as a befuddled inductee to the MIB 
organization.  My personal favorite (and obviously the audience's) was 
Vincent DiOnofrio as, well, a loathsome human who gets hijacked by an 
even more loathsome alien.  His spastic body English had me in 
hysterics from beginning to end.
In short, MIB is hysterically funny, with lots of witty dialog and 
beautifully rendered sight gags.  If you could combine Terminator 2 
with Beetlejuice, you'd have a rough approximation of what I mean.  
I'll stop here and just advise that you get in line on opening night.  
What a blast!

Author
Jeff Shooman
First Impressions:  Critically, a close-to-awful film, but money-wise, it has
been doing (and will continue to do) great.  A sometimes-funny film that sags
and lags and oftentimes gets boring.  An orginal plot that grows old real
fast.  One of the only 90 minute films that I've gotten bored through.
MEN IN BLACK has defied the odds.  When I first saw that the flick was
89 minutes long, I thought maybe that this was a poor attempt at an
INDEPENDENCE DAY type film that just ran out of gas.  However, I now
realize that not only did MEN IN BLACK run out of gas, but the film in
90 minutes manages to show off a very original idea (which summer
audiences have embraced) that becomes old about 25 minutes into the movie.
Tommy Lee Jones and Will Smith play two "government" agents who are
responsible for keeping order in alien society.  The ridiculous plot begins
when an alien "bug", played weirdly by Vincent D'Onofrio, who was so great in
FULL METAL JACKET, lands on Earth to retrieve a galaxy that's somewhere on
"Orion's belt."  Anyway, the basic plot revolves around Jones and Smith to
stop this bug from getting the galaxy, or a higher power will blow up the
earth.
The premise is ridulous, but that is not why I didn't like this film.  I love
original plots.  This one had an original one.  But director Barry Sonnenfeld
did something to this film that ruined its plot:  He made the film drag and
also put in unncessary elements in it that are found in romance films.
 Whenever I saw D'Onofrio's bug stomp and eat people in the film, it got
terribly boring after a while.  While Smith's wise-cracks did fill in the
gaps, it wasn't enough.  And also, I cannot believe the screenwriters elected
to have a sub-plot where Tommy Lee Jones missed his former lover because as
an alien agent, they can't have contact with any humans really.  And here I
see Jones, at a satellite computer, watching his lover plant the garden?  A
sentimental moment in an alien movie?  Nice try, but I don't think so.  It
doesn't work here.  It just makes the movie even more ridiculous and even
more boring:  We don't only have aliens to worry about, but now we have
Jones's conscience.  
I came into the movie not wanting to see Jones's conscience, but wanting to
see a real action movie that had lots of aliens in it.  Maybe it's unfair
that I partly judged this movie on what my expectations were.  Nevertheless,
even though some parts are indeed funny, the plot in this movie grew old and
boring -- quick.

Author
C.J Hill
Just who are the Men In Black?  Well, I'll tell you.
They're an unofficial yet highly funded government agency.  That's who.
Their job, to monitor extra-terrestial activity.
Now, this film pulls no punches here.  It starts of letting you know
that aliens have been co-existing with us humans for over 40 years.
The Men In Black make sure those that live here on Earth, stay in their
designated areas (disguised as humans of course), and they also monitor
all visitations and departures.  Should anything alien related be
witnessed by a human, the Men In Black turn up in their dark suits,
sunglasses and armed with a pen with a red light on it, erase the poor
witness's memory of the event.
Yep, it's all very tongue in cheek and in places, and it's atmosphere is
very similar indeed to the Tim Burton masterpiece Mars Attacks.  
This is, no doubt, due to the fact that director Barry Sonnenfeld was
also responsible for the dark comedies The Addams Family and Addams
Family Values.
The plot to Men In Black, doesn't require too much attention, so this
should keep the attention of any young ones in the audience.
It mainly revolves around the discovery of an alien race trying to
provoke all out war for it's own benefit.  Nothing more to it than that,
really.
What really draws the viewer into this dark comedy is it's superb visual
effects provided those masters Industrial Light and Magic, whose
outstanding work can also be drooled over in the special editions of the
Star Wars Trilogy and The Lost World.
Yes, they really are great, including a cute little alien hiding and
controlling a human from the inside with little levers!
Men In Black moves along at a very quick pace indeed.
The script is very lively and funny and this is enhanced by the
excellent chemistry between Tommy Lee Jones (Agent K) and the ever
chucklesome Will Smith (Agent J).
To sum up, Men In Black is a lively, amusing and visually stunning film.
My only gripe is that it's over far too quickly.
Executive Producer Steven Spielberg has, no doubt, some credit owed to
him for the family quality wrapped around this very pleasant diversion
and perhaps I may get to forgive him for the very poor Lost World...
Perhaps.
The overall feel that comes across whilst watching Men In Black, is that
you can't help but feel that Men In Black's purpose is a pleasant and
very enjoyable, short term filler, a bit like my popcorn really.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 3 July 1997 with Andrea for $8.75 at the SONY 84th St. theatre,
where MiB played in all six threatres.
My initial fear: Once again I was going on opening weekend to an already
overhyped movie, another idiotic supersummermegablockbuster with "hit"
written all over it simply because a lot of money has been put into
advertising and Newsweek has seen fit to ignore North Korean famine and
put Mr. Smith and Mr. Jones on their cover last week. 
Needless to say I was very pleasantly surprised. 
The writing was quickly paced and witty; the special effects were
excellent; all the performances on target. The likelihood of a sequel
welcome. The only thing missing, thank god, were the fag jokes.
In *Men in Black*, Earth is a planet-sized safe house for a variety of
aliens, most of whom are conveniently located in the New York Metropolitan
Area. A special unit, the Men in Black, keep track of alien activity and
keep the world "safe for humanity." This involves chasing down renegades
and making humans forget they ever saw anything. This has some emotional
price, though: all MiBs must cut off all ties with their lives and
dedicate themselves to their task, using the *Star* and the *National
Enquirer* as authoritative news sources. 
Kay (Tommy Lee Jones) recruits NYPD officer James Edwards (who becomes
Jay) t. His agility and offbeat ways suit their needs, and
K and Zed (Rip Torn) decide to mold him into one of their agents.
By the second day on the job, though, the world is in danger, and it is up
to J and K to save it. They inadvertently get help from Laurel (Linda
Fiorentino), a NYC coroner who prefers the dead, and sometimes a cat, to
the most living humans.
Just as Jay and Kay are introduced in dramatic fashion, so is the villain,
whose ship crashes into farmer Edgar's (Vincent D'Onofrio) truck. Edgar's
body is quickly used as a host to an intergalactic giant cockroach who has
come to assassinate an alien royal and start interplanetary war. He sort
of "deteriorates" along they way, so the talented but hard to place
D'Onofrio (Household Saints, Full Metal Jacket) is even harder to place
here, as his voice sounds more like Christopher Lloyd's than his own. 
There is something joyous about a movie that hits so many marks so well. 
The dialogue crackles without sagging under innuendo (like Batman &
Robin). The opening sequence, accompanied by Danny Elfman's score (great
as always), draws you in, and almost every scene succeeds, whether it is
involving special effects, sight gags, or truly evocative mise-en-scene
(note the later scene in the coroner's office). New York City is used in
every outdoor shot, but it is not the New York people are used to seeing
in the movies--the Bridge and Tunnel Authority building, the armory on
25th Street, the rotting ruins of the 1964 World's Fair (used in the
finale).
Men in Black comes at a perfect time, when UFO movies abound, The X Files
is part of the national consciousness, and the Roswell incident celebrates
its fiftieth anniversary. It's a relief not to see the "unravelling
conspiracy" scenario for the umpteenth time, and it's fun to watch Jones,
Smith, Fiorentino, and Torn chew the scenery.
Major Motiion Picture Distractions: Sat next to a man who sucked his teeth
and laughed like the cartoon character Muttley. I am sure that explained
his sex appeal, as he had a young lady friend in tow. He snacked on
pretzel nuggets and spilled salt all over his pants. How dreamy.
Copyright 1997 Seth J. Bookey, New York, NY 10021
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/Acropolis/8588/kino.html

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith, Linda Fiorentino, Rip Torn, Vincent
D'Onofrio, Tony Shalhoub Director: Barry Sonnenfeld Screenplay: Ed
Solomon based on the comic book by Lowell Cunningham
Mr Jones and Mr Smith wear black well,
Tailor made suits and "sunnys" look swell,
Two lone rangers who patrol human space,
Searching for illegal aliens, terminating their unwelcome stay,
I don't mean Mexicans, and I don't mean Cubans,
I do mean alien bugs which leave a sugar spectral trace,
Who wear humans well, and make "Stretch and Wear" look swell,
Poor Vincent D'Onofrio's face.
So the story is decent and somewhat compelling,
Throw in some nifty guns and loud explosions,
A puzzle on Orion's belt and a royal assassination,
Where the answer to earth's salvation rests in "Meow".
The actors are professional but less propelling,
Jones is serious and wry, not boring or dry,
Smith is smart mouthed and cheeky, not obnoxious or sleazy,
But it's the aliens which make this story, by far the most exciting.
So in this cocktail of laughs set on this rocky planet,
We have a mixture of "buggy" action with genuine illegal aliens,
Making the hangover effect of this movie a not too unpleasant experience,
For those willing to pay for the ride.
So don't worry and don't scurry about,
Red Martians, Purple Plutonians or Orange Uranians,
Rest assured, be comforted,
That these "Men in Black", will be back, next summer?
To protect the earth for another large chunk of box office takes.

Author
Christopher Null
At last, someone remembered how to make a good summer movie!
With a clever, funny script and dead-on acting by title characters Will
Smith and Tommy Lee Jones at the heart of this hot weather gem, MIB gets
it all just about right, succeeding at crossing the sci-fi and comedy
genres where recent experiments like MARS ATTACKS! crashed and burned. 
Linda Fiorentino, almost unbilled in a great supporting role, also lends
a fun sexiness to the film -- a picture in which the leads seem
perfectly crafted for its stars.
While the plotline about chasing an interstellar bug around New York is
a little spare (clocking in at around 90 minutes) and devoid of much
sub-plot, it's so damn funny that you'll practically forget about all of
that... another trick that recent offerings haven't pulled off.  Also,
make sure you stay to the end, wherein a surprisingly humble look at
life is revealed... especially when you consider that this came from
Hollywood.
-Christopher Null  /  null@poboxes.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Author
Dan Kim
Imagine if you will, a few of the more colorful characters you've run
across in your lifetime. Have you ever pondered their oddball
idiosyncrasies thinking that maybe, just maybe this guy is too weird to
be human? (Editorial note: I myself have often been the focus of such
inquiry). Now along comes a movie that says such people are in fact,
aliens in disguise and are right here, living among us.
`Men in Black' is an hour-and-half movie filled with satire and humor.
Its setting in New York city is obviously not a randomly selected city,
but the victim of much of the human/alien satire. And appropriately so.
Apparently, earth has become refuge for aliens looking for honest work
a place to live, and occasionally a planet where political refugees can
find some degree of security. These aliens are kept accountable by a
top-secret, highly funded, yet little known agency known only as the
Men in Black (MiB).
The movie starts off with a man smuggling illegal aliens in a van going
across the Mexican border. They're soon stopped and interrogated by the
INS when the MiB show up and take over. It seems one of the people is
coming from quite a bit farther than Baja. This individual is taken
aside and interrogated by MiB agent named K (Tommy Lee Jones). As it
turns out this `Mexican," who is wanted for violating seven
intergalactic treaties, is really a "Coyame", a Samarium-based life
form named Mikey.
At same time NYPD officer James Edwards (played by the amusingly
hyperkinetic Will Smith) is hot pursuit of an agile criminal with the
rather inhuman ability to leap off tall bridges unscathed, and climb up
a building without the aid of a ladder, suction cups, spider-power,
etc. Finally running him down, Edwards discovers that this particular
criminal may not be all that he seems after seeing the guy blink his
eyes the sideways.
The ever-resourceful K discovers Edward's running prowess and recruits
him into the top-secret agency. So the fun begins.
MiB entertains most with its deadpan style of humor, aided especially
by Jones' stone-faced line delivery. Few things are sacred in this
movie, especially New York, the butt of much of the humor in this film.
You cannot help but laugh at how casually K describes Earth being a
haven for aliens, much like the movie `Casablanca' but without the
Nazis. Or how the first alien contact was covered up by holding the
World's Fair in New York, and that they are actually real flying
saucers. `Why else would we hold it in Queens?' he asks. Even his stoic
face is the subject of a couple of funny quips. Against expectations,
most of the cab drivers in New York are in fact, human.
Smith chips in with his part as the energetic and impulsive rookie MiB
agent with a street- savvy knack for figuring out who is and who isn't
what they really seem. It seems living in NY City gave him a sixth
sense to be able to pick out the truly weird. His antics dialogue is
nothing really new from him, yet his talents and good writing manage to
keep his character fresh and new and, most importantly, funny.
The cast is rounded with the always reliable Rip Torn as Zed, the gruff
voice of experience who heads up the Men In Black Organization. Linda
Fiorentino is the sultry mortician who has the misfortune to come
across more than her share of weird corpses. Kudos, however, to Vincent
D'Onofrio for playing Edgar the bug. Initially, he starts off as a
redneck who gets his innards sucked out by an intergalactic roach that
crash landed near his farm. This bug dons his skin as a disguise in an
attempt to blend in with his surroundings, which, considering it's New
York, how hard could it be? Apparently the Edgar skin is a rather
ill-fitting one, not good considering the bug itself hasn't mastered
the science of human kinesiology. This causes him to move around with
spasms, facial expressions, and twitches that makes Michael Richards of
`Seinfeld' fame seem like Lord of the Dance by comparison. D'Onofrio
looks to have given his 110% into this role and saying he deserves
Oscar consideration is not too far-fetched.
Other unexpected stars of the film are the myriad of aliens ranging
from cute (the baby squid-being) to grotesque (the bug minus its Edgar
suit) to far-out (the guy with the head that grows back). The equipment
used by the MiB is very hi-tech and also not of this Earth, most used
being the Neuralizer, which has the ability to selectively erase
certain parts of one's memories. The only thing protecting the users
are MiB-issue glasses, which evidently block the neuralizer's effects.
( Editorial note: I guess they don't call them "Ray-Bans" for nothing).
Even their weapons are visually both stunning and ridiculous at the
same time, especially the `Noisy Cricket' which provides yet another
brief moment of humor.
The plot itself is workable despite having more holes than a body-
piercing artist. The first hour of the movie contains the most
amusement. The last forty-five minutes or so feel somewhat hurried;
some things are left unexplained. It winds down to what is essentially
a creatively done beat-the-clock countdown sequence with a high `I've
been slimed factor.'
Then again, you don't go see `Men in Black' for some deep soul-
searching plot or to see political propaganda. You see it for what it
is, a light sci-fi comedy that ranks high on the laugh scale. You see
it because Sonnenfeld is adept at creating a darkly comical, yet almost
realistic atmosphere and because Mr. Jones and Mr. Smith fight the bad
boys with a quick wit and spirited on-screen chemistry, as well as with
attitudes and Series 4 De-Atomizers. Just don't forget to bring the
Ray-bans.
